   #Manger RSS Feed Manger Atom Feed

     * About me
     * My cookbooks
     * Contact
     * Life in Médoc
     * Recipes
     * Press
     * Workshops 2019

May 19, 2019

   Culinary Adventure

WORKSHOPS 2020

   It‘s been a while. In fact it‘s been a whole year. Time, it goes by in
   a blink of an eye. A year ago we announced the workshops for 2019 and
   while I didn‘t expect to go so long without posting here on my blog,
   sometimes it‘s good to take a break, reflect, discover new things.
   This year has admittedly been devoted to my upcoming Italian cookbook,
   it’s been an incredible journey, putting my soul and my efforts into
   this new adventure.
   At the same time, spending so much time in Italy since last July has
   made me miss France. They say that you can‘t be two places at once, but
   maybe you can. I spend much of my time in a culinary universe and that
   means you can go anywhere you want, teleport yourself to a place you
   love through food. Living in France we were always looking for the best
   Italian produce, a great guanciale, the finest Pecorino, a good bottle
   of Barolo. Now friends bring me French butter and cheeses to Italy.

   In the last five years we‘ve hosted hundreds of people, mostly in our
   house in Médoc, but recently also here in Piemonte. A lot of these
   people stay in touch, send me notes or comments. Beautiful food
   memories from a workshop or opening a bottle of wine from Bordeaux –
   these are sometimes flatteringly called ‘’Mimi meals“ which makes me
   blush but also makes me happy and proud.
   People, we have learnt, come for different reasons to our workshops.
   Many like cooking together, most like drinking, all like eating.
   Sitting, far too long, at a table far too full, sharing that table with
   other like minded people, strangers when they arrive, friends when they
   leave. It astonishes me every time how much you can learn about another
   person during 3 days of culinary adventures.

   I have also discovered that people take very different things back home
   with them. A few good pointers on wine. Tips on photography. Some new
   cooking techniques, discovering a new region, a dozen good recipes. How
   they would like to entertain once back home. Many people think our kids
   are well behaved. My husband doesn‘t always agree with that. Most think
   our dogs are badly behaved (but adorable), my husband certainly doesn‘t
   agree with that.
   The person who learns the most though, must be me. There are
   professions I didn‘t know existed which I can now discuss at length in
   cocktail parties, there are places I never heard about that I now dream
   of visiting. If these workshops demonstrate anything it‘s how different
   people can be and yet, once at the table, all so alike.

   France is in my blood, I‘ve been eating French food since I was born.
   Italy has always been there for me but it‘s been a steep learning curve
   since we moved here last summer. Writing a cookbook, I suppose, can be
   easy. A hundred recipes that work, some nice shots. But a book that
   really means something to me, does justice to Italy, is respectful,
   accessible to readers is harder. So much to choose from, so many
   different ways to cook the same things. Just when you feel satisfied
   you cook something new, try something new. A sauce that you thought
   couldn‘t be made better suddenly can. A new secret ingredient, a little
   touch. It‘s all finally coming together, can‘t wait to show you the
   results next year.

   When we first started out we had not plan to do this beyond the first
   year. Every year we ask ourselves, around this time of the year. What
   about next year? And the answer is always obvious. Why on earth
   wouldn‘t we. To say that the workshops have been a success, for us and
   the guests, is an understatement. We still have no plan, life is full
   of possibilities. What happens in 2021 is anyone‘s guess, but next year
   the show will go on, we are as enthusiastic as ever. France is still
   our home, Italy is our new home. We love to share both and are happy to
   invite you to one or the other.

   This time we decided to list only our classic workshops (many readers
   have been asking me to posts new dates for 2020), both in France and
   Italy. People, we have found out, like to plan ahead and many or most
   of our bookings happen up to a year in advance.
   We do, however, have a few more ideas up our sleeve, something
   different, a road trip, a visit to a new place, but that may or may not
   happen, and would be announced with much less notice.

   Additionally while most of the workshops for 2019 have been full for a
   long time we did recently add a new ‘Fall harvest workshop in Médoc’,
   October 2019 and while that workshop is almost full we could still add
   a few people.

   Workshops of 2020

   2020 is our sixth year of hosting workshops and like I said last year I
   think we‘ve come up with a good formula in Médoc that works for most
   people, including us. 3 seems to be the magic number of days.

   The price for a Médoc workshop is 2.500 euros per person with
   everything included except accommodation which guests choose themselves
   – but don‘t worry, we have plenty of good options for you.

   The Italian workshops are 3.500 euros per person but then we include 2
   nights accommodation, transportation during the workshop (although you
   have to get yourself to and from Torino first), all food and wine, with
   some meals in restaurants.

   Please note that all deposits are non-refundable. I find that to be a
   necessary step to avoid confusion and frivolous bookings. Should,
   however, something prevent you from attending the workshop you booked
   (and I know from experience that this can happen) I would be very happy
   to find other dates that work for you in the future.

   For those who follow me on Instagram, you can catch a glimpse of our
   previous workshops @mimithor.

   Looking forward to hearing from you all,
   Mimi xx

   For all bookings and further detailed information please write to me:
   [email protected]

   Workshops at our property in Médoc, France

   June 24-26, 2020 ‘’The annual Summer abundance workshop“

   By now this workshop is a classic, a yearly staple, just like the Fall
   Harvest workshop. The format is simple, long days and nights of
   cooking, feasting and drinking wine. A seemingly endless run of long
   tables, swaying from all the goodness, inside or al fresco, some
   surprises of course, wine tastings and much loveliness. While the
   outline is clear we are always open to improvisation and the most
   important ingredient is you, the characters. Like a new staging of an
   old favorite play. You love it because it‘s familiar and you love it
   because it‘s new.

   Cost of participation 2.500 euros.

   September 16-18, 2020 The annual Fall Harvest workshop

   Another big classic every year is this celebration of fall. In addition
   to the wine harvest which is really what our region is all about we
   will forage for mushrooms if the conditions are right, we‘ll set up a
   feast in the forest, we‘ll take advantage of cooking at this bountiful
   time when we still have some tomatoes left in our garden but the figs,
   pumpkins and chestnuts have already arrived. Moving this workshop a
   little bit forward in the calendar improves the chances of warm weather
   which means meals al fresco.

   Cost of participation 2.500 euros.

   Workshops in Piemonte, Italy

   Spring in Piemonte workshops 2020

   Date: April 15-17, 2020

   Date: May 13-15, 2020

   Fall in Piemonte workshops 2020

   Date: September 23-25, 2020

   Date: October 21-23, 2020

   The ‘’Spring in Piemonte workshop’’ we hosted in April this year was
   absolutely lovely and one of my new favorites. As always these
   workshops are about cooking, eating, tasting wine but also discovering
   this lesser known part of Italy. Torino was built by the Savoy dynasty
   of France who transferred their capital from Chambery to Piemonte and
   went on to lead the unification of Italy. Thus Torino was the first
   capital of a unified Italy which surprisingly only happened in 1861.
   Piemonte is the home of the slow food movement, some of the finest
   wines in Italy, most notably the Barolos and Barbarescos, leading
   coffee roasters, such as our friends the Vergnano family who will give
   us the most heartfelt coffee lesson. Piemonte is the land of fresh
   pasta, big meats, hazelnuts and has one of the best organic farmers
   market on the planet. Torino, the regional capital of Piemonte, is
   where they invented the aperitivo, started Italian cinema, a majestic
   city built for kings, with glorious castles sprinkled around the
   surrounding countryside.
   We will spend our time partly in Torino itself and partly in the wine
   making hills of the Langhe Roero. There will be hands on cooking in
   beautiful locations but also visits to our friend‘s restaurants where
   we‘ll see some demonstrations. There will be photography for those who
   want, there will be wine. It‘s about discovering Piemonte through its
   food and wine, taking home some recipes and memories.

   Cost of participation for all the Piemonte workshops is 3.500 euros per
   person including 2 nights accommodation.
   10 comments

May 9, 2018

   Culinary Adventure

Workshops 2019

   Good ideas – Moveable feasts

   When we first found and fell in love with the big house at 1 rue de
   Loudenne, a building rich with history and many past lives, we wanted
   to turn parts of it into a restaurant. It was a good idea but we soon
   came up with something better, more intimate and more enjoyable. How
   about, a few times a year, having groups of people come to our house,
   not for one meal but several. Cook with them, get to know them, share
   our lives, our knowledge of food, photography, wine and France. My
   blog, that I had started a few years earlier, was keeping me occupied
   and happy, communicating with readers, sharing recipes and glimpses of
   my life a very satisfying experience but I always felt the need for an
   increased reality, talking about a place is one thing, actually being
   there is another. A chef in a restaurant rarely meets his diners, a
   waiter does but usually only on a superficial level. Having many meals
   together in a row, many wines in a row, cooking together, sharing a
   bountiful table seemed like a good idea, and it turns out it was. We
   are in our 4th year of hosting workshops and I’m quite frankly loving
   it. I always had a feeling my readers were wonderful people and now
   I’ve found out they really are. You’ve come here in great numbers, some
   of you every year (which must be a compliment) and instead of things
   getting jaded or ordinary they are getting better. The basic idea
   remains the same, people come here in the morning, we cook, eat, drink
   and when we’re done we do it all over again. Of course there are all
   sorts of distractions, differently emphasized depending on the theme of
   the workshop, the time of year. Wine always plays a huge part,
   sometimes photography does too. Exploring the region, foraging, meeting
   our friends, sometimes cooking at their place, especially if they live
   on winemaking châteaux.

   But this good idea has evolved, taken on a life of its own – it’s
   almost a concept by now, 1 rue de Loudenne is a real house, a house
   where you can visit, have champagne, make soufflés, have wine tastings,
   lunches under the olive trees or drink wonderful Bordeaux wines in
   front of the fire as the duck breast snarls on the sarment wine
   branches in the fireplace. But it’s also a virtual place, an idea of
   how life can be lived, something you can bring back home with you like
   ( a much better writer than me once called it ) a moveable feast.
   In a broader context this is what we are working on creating with our
   new website that’s very delayed but still very much happening.
   www.rueloudenne.com will be the projection of our house online, a
   mirror of the ideas that come from here, and not just projecting online
   what’s happening in this house but in other places where food and
   quality takes a central stage. Places you can visit for real … or in
   spirit, places of the heart … and stomach.

   I have also found that good ideas can travel, they are not bound to a
   house, no matter how good the house may be. And good ideas must evolve
   to stay young and fresh. This year I’m working on a new cookbook once
   again with Clarkson Potter (the Crown Publishing Group), on a subject
   that’s very close to our hearts – Italian cooking. We’ve taken most of
   our holidays, forever, in Italy. We’ve traveled there extensively,
   spent much time and discovered places, sometimes through our work for
   Condé Nast Traveler, that we could never have imagined but always knew
   were there (if that makes sense). The idea is to bring to the reader,
   not only my take on Italian cooking but that of my Italian friends who
   have helped me discover the originality and specialness of their
   respective regions. To do this well (and why would I bother if that
   wasn’t the plan) we have decided to take up a secondary residence in
   Torino (Turin), a city we have all fallen in love with. Rue Loudenne
   will remain our home but this is a new chapter in our lives and as I
   once said, why not? – while we’re still young. As I said, I believe
   that good ideas can travel and the idea is to bring the moveable feast
   that is Rue Loudenne to Italy for some special workshops throughout the
   year as we’ll be partially based there.

   A guest attending once asked me, in the early days, “Is there anything
   special I need to bring to the workshop?” My answer then was “Just
   bring an open mind and an empty stomach”.
   That is still the answer.

   I hope you like what we have planned for next year, I know it seems
   quite far away now but as always I have received so many requests from
   people who are more organised than myself to give the dates and I’m
   glad they do – it’s wonderful to have something to look forward to.

Workshops of 2019

   2019 being our fifth year I believe we’ve come up with a good “formula”
   for the classic workshops, something that works for most people and is
   enjoyable. 3 days seem to be the magic number of days, we usually start
   at 10.30 in the morning, cook a lunch together and then take a 2 hour
   break in the afternoon before reconvening, with a glass or two of
   champagne in one hand, some kitchen utensil in the other (and sometimes
   that kitchen utensil is just a cork screw), cook dinner.

   The price for a standard workshop is 2.000 euros per person with
   everything included except accommodation which guests choose themselves
   – but don’t worry we have plenty of good options for you, wonderful
   B&B’s, beautiful houses rented out by friends …

   Some workshops have additional supplements in terms of cost, often due
   to the fact we’re traveling, with some or all accommodation included,
   some restaurant meals or transportation. How much depends on which
   workshop. The two road trips are also longer workshops and therefore
   more costly.

   Please note that all deposits are non-refundable. I find that to be a
   necessary step to avoid confusion and frivolous bookings. Should,
   however, something prevent you from attending the workshop you booked
   (and I know from experience that this can happen) I would be very happy
   to find other dates that work for you.

   Looking forward to hearing from you all,
   Mimi xx

   For all bookings and further information please
   contact: [email protected]

   Workshops at my house in Médoc, France

   May 15 – 18, 2019 “The French wine Master class”, a roadtrip

   Having lived and breathed Bordeaux wines for almost a decade now,
   having always loved wine, having wine makers as some of our closest
   friends, having even made our own wine – it’s safe to say that we’ve
   learnt a thing or two along the way. Wine has truly become a passion
   for us on so many levels, a nectar full of history, flavor, terroir and
   tradition. While most of the workshops touch to a larger or lesser
   degree on the subject of wine we thought, 4 years later, it was time to
   devote a whole workshop, not just to our beloved Bordeaux but also to
   the wines of other French wine regions we love. We’ll start in
   Champagne, meet some of our favorite producers, do tastings and end the
   day in Paris with a feast at one of our best-loved restaurants. The
   following day we’ll head down to Burgundy where we’ll continue our
   education/indulging and spend a night in the region after a typical
   Lyonnaise bistrot meal. On the third day we’ll head down to Bordeaux
   (it’s a bit of a drive so be warned), starting in St Émilion and
   spending the night in Bordeaux city. On the last day we’ll drive up to
   Médoc, meet our friends who make wine and finally cooking a last feast
   together at our house, 1 rue de Loudenne in St Yzans.

   This is a 4-day workshop which is unusual but we just don’t feel we can
   do this properly and enjoyably in 3 day. This workshop carries a
   supplement due to accommodation included, restaurant meals etc.

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   June 12-14, 2019 “The summer workshop”

   This is a workshop I’m particularly excited about. We will cook dishes
   inspired from all our favourite “perfect bistrots”.  We will form
   groups and come up with beautiful menus, wine pairings, table settings,
   flower arrangements. It will be a classic workshop with a twist.

   • Cost of participation: 2000 euros per person

   June 19 – 21, 2019 “The annual Summer abundance workshop”

   Probably the most popular workshop of the last 2 years, so popular in
   fact that we added a second one in 2018. This is a celebration of
   summer and seasonal produce, when the season is still young and full of
   the freshest fruits and vegetables. A traditional workshop in summer
   clothes, with al fresco lunches and dinners, long communal tables,
   picnics and barbecues on the beaches and in the vineyards – the color
   of this workshop is rosé …

   • Cost of participation: 2000 euros per person

   September 25 – 27, 2019 “The first Fall harvest & wine workshop”

   Médoc is a wine region above anything else and while the talk most of
   the year is of nothing but wine (and perhaps meat, mushrooms and
   oysters) the harvest is September is the culmination of it all – the
   region really comes alive, migrant workers flock to Médoc to pick in
   the day, party in the evenings – there are endless feasts and events, a
   time for celebration and sometimes also worry. The most Médoc of all
   periods. This will be a classic workshop, with much cooking and eating
   at our house but the thread of intrigue will be the wine picking (which
   we will participate in) the wine partying (which we will also
   participate in), some early foraging, some late summer celebrating. One
   of my favorite times of the year when we can still enjoy tomatoes and
   are already having mushrooms and pumpkins.

   • Cost of participation: 2000 euros per person

   October 2 – 4, 2019 “The second Fall harvest workshop”

   Another classic workshop that’s proven incredibly popular. A similar
   take on the season as the Summer abundance but with slightly warmer
   clothes and different colors and flavors. Foraging for mushrooms, a
   feast in the forest, hanging out with local hunters (for those who
   dare), serious wine tastings, recipes rich with autumn produce and
   local game.

   • Cost of participation: 2000 euros per person

   October 9-11, 2019 “The new Fall harvest workshop”

   Because of the popularity of the first two Fall harvest workshops we
   decided recently to add a third workshops in the same style and theme,
   please contact us for availability.

   • Cost of participation: 2000 euros per person

Workshops in Italy

   April 17 – 19, 2019 “Spring in Piemonte”

   By then my Italian cookbook will be done and I’ll be full of knowledge,
   new tricks and inspiration. Piemontese cooking has really taken me by
   storm and I can’t wait to share all my newfound secrets. We’ll stay in
   the Langhe – Roero winemaking region (where they make Barolos) and
   spend our days cooking together, eating together, visiting one or two
   restaurants to sample the best of the region. We have decided, for the
   sake of variety and to make everyone happy, that I’ll stay put in the
   kitchen while others, like my husband Oddur who is a photographer and
   who loves wine intimately – will take those who want on wine tours and
   offer photography classes – a sort of cooking relief for those who need
   it, or spouses and friends who come along for the ride but would rather
   taste wine than actually cook too much. It’s a something for everyone
   formula 

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   July 4-6, 2019 “The Mysteries of Turin”

   The most unusual workshop of the year … and the most mysterious. Turin
   is a legendary city, the only one in the world that lies on both the
   so-called Black and White triangles. For three days we’ll indulge in
   good food and wine, while diving into these mysteries, like in a good
   detective novel (where the detective likes to eat and drink), fascinate
   ourselves with the legends, the shroud of Turin, the origins of Italian
   cinema, the legend of Carlo Mollino. Where Julia Child meets Agatha
   Christie. I’ve got goosebumps writing this …

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   October 15-19, 2019 “The Great Italian roadtrip” … a cookbook revisited

   Over the years we’ve been fortunate enough to visit some special places
   in Italy and the coming year will see us do even more travel as we put
   the finishing touches on my Italian cookbook. Come October 2019 we’ll
   be, not only celebrating the realisation of all that cooking and travel
   in the form of a book, but also inspired to revisit the settings of our
   food discoveries and photographing, sharing our favorite destinations
   with a few good and interested people who love Italy and want to know
   her better. We’ll start in Rome and work our way up through 5 regions
   until we’ll end up in Piemonte (of course) where we’ll have a farewell
   dinner (that we’ll cook together ) in our Turin apartment.

   This is a 5-day “extravaganza” workshop

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   November 21-22, 2019 “The Venice workshop”

   We’ve been dying to host a workshop in Venice for the last two year and
   finally the stars have aligned for us and our favourite Venetians, the
   Romanellis, who will host us at their properties, Hotel Flora and Casa
   Flora. The first day of this workshop is the feast of “La Maddonna
   della Salute” so the atmosphere in this magical city will be even more
   special than usual. 3 days and nights of cooking, feasting and
   discovering Venice together.

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   December 5-7, 2019 “Festive in Piemonte”

   The white truffles of Alba are one of the most sought after foods in
   the world. And for good reason, come October/November and Piemontese
   chefs & waiters will grate or slice truffles on just about everything
   they serve you – and it will all be delicious. We’ll escape the crowds
   but catch the truffles in local restaurants, set up a kitchen where
   we’ll cook away and explore the early winter country and festive
   cooking of Piemonte. This will be a workshop comparable to the “Spring
   in Piemonte” workshop but with vastly different ingredients and weather
   and some early Christmas influences for a festive atmosphere.

   • for furthers details and cost of participation, please send me an
   email on [email protected]

   22 comments

April 20, 2018

   Life in Médoc

WORKSHOP UPDATE … AND A FEW WORDS ON FOOD PHOTOGRAPHY

   A few seats left

   A first, wonderful early spring workshop is behind us and I must say
   it’s nice to be back on track, preparing meals, sharing our kitchen,
   our table, our region. Getting started has prompted me to get
   organised, to look at the registrations for the upcoming workshops,
   contact people etc. After doing the math and receiving response from a
   few people with tentative status, here are the workshops with some
   (usually very limited) availability this year.

   Next week we are headed to Piemonte for a very exciting workshop which
   is full of lovely people, some returning. So no spaces there.

   After that we have the Basque workshop which is pretty full but I had
   one person postpone so I could add 1-2 people to that workshop. May
   16-18

   Next is the Summer Wine – some reservations have confirmed they
   couldn’t come this time so we still have a bit of space there. May 30 –
   June 1

   Then there is the Summer Abundance workshop which was so enormously
   popular that we added a second, identical workshop the following week.
   I had turned a lot of people away but then, when the requests kept
   pouring in we added the second one and some people from the first one
   even switched dates. So now we have two, quite evenly booked Summer
   abundance workshops and while I’d be perfectly happy to keep the
   numbers how they are right now I could still add 1-2 people to each.
   June 20-22 & June 27-29

   There are still some spaces in the Piemonte Photography and wine
   workshop on September 27 – 29

   The Fall Harvest workshop is one of the all time most booked so that
   one is impossible – we could have filled it up 3 times. I’ve been
   trying to look at possibilities to add a second one but right now I
   just can’t find the time for it. October 10-12

   The Autumn wine is less booked so close to full but not quite October
   24-26

   Additionally I’ve been getting many requests for the dates in 2019 so
   we are looking at that right now and I expect to announce in May or
   early June.

   For all information please email me at [email protected]

   Looking forward to hearing from you

   Mimi xx

   Over to my husband who has a few things to say … about cabbage, onions
   & co.

   Tuesday vegetables and other things

   Although Mimi and I both love to eat fresh vegetables we have a
   distinctively different relationship with them. At the market she’s
   searching for inspiration, something that catches her eye, something
   she can bring home and slice up, boil, steam or grill and ultimately
   make it into something much more delicious than it was in the
   beginning. It’s a gut feeling – literally. My sole vegetable hunts,
   which are very frequent are more like casting sessions but practical
   ones – without a fault the freshest vegetables are also the most
   eye-catching, what’s in season stands out. I try to look for the really
   interesting “faces”, not just the shiny rows of monotone soldiers, but
   the odd fellows, the slightly deformed – the organic boys.

   Our vegetable symphony marches on in perfect harmony, the house is
   always full to the rafters of the freshest produce, from local growers,
   and in summer, from our garden. The tricky day is Tuesday. Mimi will
   have cooked all the stuff she bought at the weekend but a lot of mine
   is still sitting there, getting less pretty by the minute. I often tell
   people that while I’m most probably a photographer by profession my
   real job is arranging vegetables. And most of that never gets
   photographed. I use the word “arrange” loosely as “throw them in” would
   be more in the spirit of what I do. I don’t believe in over-styling but
   I do subscribe to elements like chance and luck. Let the carrots fall
   where they may.

   This brings us back to Tuesday. Last Tuesday to be exact. We had some
   lovely gentlemen coming down from Paris for lunch – they will be our
   “leather partners” in items such as aprons, dog leashes etc. It’s taken
   a long time to find the right people – Joseph Bonnie.
   We were late as we always are and after walking the dogs I had to
   choose between a shower or my vegetables. They were sitting there in
   crates, slowly going in the wrong direction of aesthetic pulchritude.
   The light would not be better later. Tomorrow these veggies would be
   over the hill of photographable beauty. Certain flowers and vegetables
   age well. Roses are like that. Tulips are not, not in my opinion
   anyway. The stalks fade to a yellowish-green that I find unbearable.
   Apples dry up, lemons (if they’re not radio-active) turn to a powderish
   green. Celery fades, carrots limp, asparagus shrivels and cherries
   ferment in rather a beautiful but not in the “I want to eat them” sort
   of way.

   So a long story cut short I threw it all on a table and shot it, even
   brougth out a camera rather than a phone. The result is not magnificent
   but it’s fine. Fine enough for Mimi to say “my love (once again I
   inserted that), I’m giving some workshop updates on the blog – why
   don’t we post these and perhaps you can write something about them”. So
   now, while she’s on the roof, looking lovely in a bikini, I’m down here
   in the green room typing away – I type fast, a result of going to
   commercial college – they also taught book-keeping but I must have
   slept through that. Yes, typing away with a Negroni in front of me.
   Right now it’s about two-thirds down but I’m not even half-finished
   which is a terrifying though for any “writer”.

   There is Champagne in the freezer though, a nice blanc de noirs
   (meaning white from black, only red grapes, pinot noir or pinot
   meunier). Yes, freezer because contrary to some wise guy sommeliers
   who’d love to serve the Champagne almost luke warm so it can properly
   “express itself” I fervently believe that Champagne should be served
   ice-cold. For those who’d like it a few degrees warmer, they can just
   wait a bit, but no Champagne ever got colder by sitting in a glass. The
   only exception is, that if you have a truly exceptional Champagne,
   something old, something from a single vineyard that’s hard to get,
   something so expensive that it feels like a bullet through the heart
   when the cork shoots through the air. Then, just maybe then, should you
   not put it in a freezer. And this is just my theory, not a fact –
   examples of really good Champagnes if you can find them are the ´99
   Winston Churchill from Pol Roger, the single vineyards from Jacquesson,
   Salon is beautiful (but too expensive), anything from Selosse, Egly
   Ouriet, especially the blanc de noirs I’m in love with – Drappier Brut
   Nature might be the best buy on the planet – Ulysse Collin is hard to
   find but worth the search and out of the very big houses I favor
   Bollinger over anybody. As did James Bond. Like everybody I love Krug
   but you can find the same quality for less. And yes, Dom Perignon is
   actually very good. As is Cristal – I love the 2002.

   Sorry – got carried away here. We were talking about vegetables. And my
   brief was food photography. Maybe we should go back to the beginning.
   My father bought me a good camera when I was about 14, my family is
   academic and arts were considered a … past time. Lawyers, doctors etc –
   that what you do for a living. I started law school, well enough I
   might add (important for my ego to leave that in). But then I realised
   it wasn’t for me. Some comparative literature (just lovely – Chekhov
   particularly), jobs in magazines, advertising and ultimately
   photography. For me it’s always been about the visuals. But I was
   always interested in people. In portraits. Then I met Mimi who is, as
   you know, interested in food. Some people might call it an obsession. A
   healthy one. One day we were having a fairly good coq-au-vin (which is
   getting to be a rarity in Parisian restaurants), then a crème caramel.
   We were supposed to shoot the place and I took an overhead shot which
   in those days was not nearly as fashionable as it is now in the days of
   iPhones. It’s not a perfect shot but somehow it’s got all the element
   that define what I do. It’s classic. There’s a trace of the coq-au-vin
   pot. It’s simple and stylish. The floor is good, there’s a white
   napkin. I didn’t realize it then but that will always be the most
   important food picture I’ll ever take. And my style hasn’t changed much
   since or, which may be regrettable, improved. But none of that really
   matters, to me what matters is instinct.

   I’ve been reading a fine book about my favorite painter, Breakfast with
   Lucian. It demonstrates that he’s not introspective (which is comical
   given his family and famous name) but instinctive. Which is what I am
   too (and it’s very dangerous comparing yourself to a genius because it
   implies I’m putting us in the same category but I’m not … not yet
   anyway ha ha – just because I might say I like Champagne Pol Roger like
   Winston Churchill doesn’t necessarily imply that I think we’re cut from
   the same cloth, just that a small amount of our tastes and sensiblities
   are aligned). To me photography is instinct. Which is why I adore dogs.
   That, however, is another matter and a much longer story.

   I’ve included, for your amusement (hopefully) a few other images that
   in one way or other depict the relationship between people and food.
   They are from the same time as the overhead food shot of the crème
   caramel. Food is nothing if nobody ever eats it – the most horrible
   concept is food photography where the food goes cold and ends up in the
   bin, maybe with some glossy, inedible oil that was put there for
   aesthetic purposes. My wife loves a good food picture, but she believes
   it could be and should be created in the short space between piping hot
   out of the oven and still hot enough to eat. As a good, Icelandic,
   soldier I consider it my duty to perfom.

   Negroni is gone, even with my best efforts of restraint it just
   couldn’t hang in there any longer, while I have much to say on this
   subject, and would love to – my priority is that bottle in the freezer.

   Enjoy your weekend, ours will be hot, full of food & wine and most
   importantly, family and friends.

   30 comments

February 15, 2018

   The Good Life

Year of the dog

   Tonight is the last day of the Chinese lunar calendar. We are entering
   the year of the dog, particularly auspicious as we have so many dogs in
   the family (my father, my husband, my son), from an astrology
   perspective and also because many are actually… dogs.

   I’ve been in the best of moods all week, despite the weather, cooking
   some Chinese favorites and enjoying various blossom branches – always
   the very first sign of spring. Those and the mimosas. Earlier in the
   week I cooked this childhood favorite, the Hainan chicken, one of the
   most soothing and comforting recipes I can think of. I wanted to cook
   something Asian to put on the blog today and while there are many other
   dishes with more flair and flavor – this one feels just right for the
   last weeks (yes I said last) of winter. It’s filled with goodness and
   all the things that keep the doctors away, garlic, ginger, broth.

   Tomorrow I’m off to Venice with the whole family, a little adventure on
   a river boat but it makes me happy that I’m keeping my promise to post
   a recipe per week.

   Wishing you all a happy, healthy, loving and prosperous Chinese new
   year! Mimi x

   Hainan Chicken Rice (serves 6)

   Chinese food is not complicated, it’s just about making sure to get a
   few steps right! Enjoy this delicious recipe, it’s my Asian comfort
   food, there are so many memories linked with this dish. Growing up in
   Hong Kong, I would meet my best friends and we would often order this
   dish (especially the one at the Clipper Lounge at the Mandarin Oriental
   hotel, do they still serve it? I hope o!). The chicken is blanched,
   dropped in an ice-bath, so it can retain its moisture. I find this
   recipe beautiful to make, like an old-fashioned ritual. And on top of
   everything, it’s such a healthy dish.

   For the chicken and the broth

   1.5 kg whole chicken
   10 cloves of garlic, halved
   A large piece (about the size of your palm) piece of ginger, sliced
   1 large bunch of spring onions (scallions)
   2 tablespoon Shao xing rice wine
   2 tablespoon light soy
   4 teaspoon sesame oil
   1 teaspoon salt and pepper

   For the chicken and broth

   Remove the chicken giblets. Rinse the chicken inside and out. Remove
   any leftover feathers and trim excess fat (you will need it for the
   rice, so set aside).
   Rub both the inside and outside of the chicken really well with coarse
   salt to ‘exfoliate’ the skin on the chicken. Rinse well and pat dry.
   The chicken will be smooth and ready for cooking. Season the chicken
   with salt and pepper.
   Boil a large pot of water and add a few spring onion stalks, slices of
   ginger and 5 cloves of peeled garlic. Fill the chicken with a few more
   ginger slices, garlic cloves and spring onion.
   Place the chicken into the large pot (neck-side down) and blanch for 2
   minutes. Remove from heat and rinse under cold water. Lower the heat
   and return the chicken to the pot, let it simmer for 30 minutes. Turn
   the heat off, cover with a lid and leave the chicken to stand for 30
   more minutes. Place the chicken in an ice bowl for a few minutes,
   remove the ice cubes and leave aside to rest and cool for 20 minutes.
   Drizzle some sesame oil and light soya sauce on the chicken. This
   technique will make the chicken extra tender.

   2) For the rice.

   Wash the rice and soak for 20 mins. Drain dry and set aside.

   In a small pan, heat the chicken fat with 1 tablespoon water and cook
   until the fat has melted. When the fat is hot, add a few slices of
   ginger and garlic, sauté for 2-3 minutes. Transfer all the ingredients
   including the oil into the rice cooker and mix in the washed rice. Add
   enough chicken stock to cook the rice according to your favorite
   method. I have a classic rice cooker, and it takes approx. 15-20
   minutes to cook.

   3) For the broth

   Re-heat the chicken stock and add salt according to your taste. I like
   to add a few tablespoons of Shao Xing wine for taste, but that is
   optional. Garnish with coriander and sliced spring onion before
   serving.

   4) For the sauce

   1 large piece of ginger (about the size of half your palm), peeled and
   cut into small chunks
   1 bunch of spring onion (scallions), chopped
   2 teaspoon sea salt, or more if you prefer
   150-200 ml/ about 2/3 cup peanut oil, add more if you want a looser
   sauce

   Place the ginger in the food processor and process until the ginger is
   finely minced. Transfer to a bowl. Repeat the same with the spring
   onions (make sure they are lightly minced). Add them to bowl with the
   ginger. Season generously with salt.
   Heat the peanut oil in a pan until it is very hot, the add the ginger
   and spring onions. Stir quickly for a 5 seconds and transfer to a bowl.
   Leave to cool and serve with chicken.

   Chop the chicken into slices (with the skin on). Drizzle with a little
   soya sauce and sesame oil. Serve with a bowl of rice, a bowl of soup,
   the ginger sauce and garnish everything with fresh coriander, sliced
   cucumber, and don’t forget your favorite chilli sauce too!
   32 comments

February 4, 2018

   Life in Médoc

Delicious Green Soup

   Sunday raid

   Sundays everywhere tend to be quiet but here in Médoc, especially in
   winter, they are extra quiet. All the stores are closed, there are no
   markets after lunch, there is nothing. Of course we always have good
   food around the house so I know we won’t starve, that would take weeks,
   but while we usually plan our Friday and Saturday meals, Sunday is a
   wild card – I like to see what happens, challenge myself to cook with
   what we have. And I must admit we probably always have more food than
   most people, even on Sundays. It’s an exercise in flavors rather than
   survival. Sometime after breakfast this morning (which was avocado and
   smoked salmon with flax-seed and a good cup of tea) I ventured into the
   “boucherie” (named after the old butcher’s table) that serves as our
   pantry. The boucherie is always cool but in February it’s very cold and
   perfect for vegetables who want to stay young. It’s also a bit of an
   Aladdin’s cave for me, I don’t go in there everyday and some of the
   stuff has been brought in by my husband without my knowledge. This
   morning I was delighted to find a fresh bundle of watercress, a little
   bit of chervil and some Jerusalem artichokes amongst all the regulars,
   such as celery, carrots and onions.

   The first weeks of the year have been calm and replenishing, a little
   too wet perhaps for my taste and my roof but a good if uneventful start
   to the year. It’s always healthy to take a step back once in a while,
   spend time with your loved ones, catch up on sleep. And to think.

   I’ve also been thinking more about being and eating healthy than usual
   and while I think we generally eat very well it’s always good to step
   up your game. We all know the rules, a little less baguette, a little
   more vegetables, take it easy on the meat and pasta, again a little
   more vegetables. A little less wine a little more water.

   Little tweaks to get ready for summer, small steps to look and feel
   better. I don’t believe in extremes, but I do believe in extremely good
   food.

   We are still planning to launch our new website this Spring but I do
   miss you all so I’ve decided to post random recipes that feel
   appropriate or inspiring – I’ll try to do one a week until the new site
   is up and running. So that we can all keep in touch.

   In other news we had so many bookings and so many requests for the
   Summer Abundance workshop in June that we decided to add a second
   Summer abundance workshop the following week – June 27th to June 29th.
   We are just starting to take bookings but it’s already filling up so if
   you’re interested please don’t hesitate to write.

   Did you that watercress has more calcium than milk, more iron than
   spinach and boosts your complexion? This is a must to make this cold
   season, so simple and delicious. I loved slicing vegetables with a
   mandoline, it makes everything easier and cook faster. Adding the
   Jerusalem artichokes chips mixed with the crispy chervil makes this
   soup so luxurious, and I love the peppery taste the watercress gives.
   I’ve added extra spices like turmeric, cloves and ginger to give that
   boost which we all need this winter.

   Watercress soup with Jerusalem artichokes and chervil chips

   2 bunches of watercress (chopped, including stems)
   1 onion, sliced finely
   2 small russet potatoes, sliced finely with a mandoline
   475 ml/ 2 cups chicken or vegetable stock,
   150 ml cream/ crème entière (optional)
   3 cloves, crushed
   A small cube-sized piece of fresh ginger, grated
   A teaspoon of turmeric
   Salt & a dash of black pepper

   For the chips:
   300 ml vegetable oil for frying
   2 Jerusalem artichokes, sliced as finely as possible with a mandoline
   A small bunch of fresh chervil
   A sprinkle of fleur de sel

   Pour the stock into a large saucepan and bring to a boil.

   Slice (with a mandoline) the potatoes and onion, and drop them into the
   stock. Cover and cook for 5 minutes, lower the heat then add the
   watercress, ginger, turmeric, cloves, salt and pepper. Cover again and
   cook for another 6 to 8 minutes, or until all the ingredients are
   tender.

   Purée the soup in the blender and add the cream.

   Heat the oil in a heavy medium-size pot until hot and ready, make a
   test by throwing in a slice of Jerusalem artichoke and if it sizzles,
   the temperature is ready for frying. Add Jerusalem artichoke slices to
   the oil in small handfuls, turning gently with a wire skimmer, until
   pale gold and crisp, about 45 seconds to a good minute. Transfer chips
   to paper towels to drain, and sprinkle with salt. Repeat the same with
   the chervil, for less than 15 seconds or so. Add them to the plate of
   chips so they get to mix, this will create a great flavour.

   Reheat the soup on a low heat and ladle the soup into bowls. Scatter
   the chips and chervil on top and serve immediately.
   85 comments

December 19, 2017

   The Good Life

Fruits d’Automne

   The Fruits of fall and vegetables of winter

   A few weeks ago, on a Sunday, the girls were playing rough in their
   room and broke an old chair they used for their desk. A pity as it was
   a nice chair … but these things happen. Fortunately, about the easiest
   thing to replace in our village on a Sunday is a desk chair. In Médoc
   nothing is open on Sundays and our village and the surrounding ones
   literally have no stores at all. All we have is an antiques store, full
   of little gems. And the best part is, it’s open on Sunday afternoons.
   In other words, in our neck of the woods you couldn’t buy diapers or
   shampoo to save your life on a Sunday but a new chandelier or a
   portrait of someone’s grandfather, not a problem. After lunch Oddur
   headed to St Christoly and came back with two chairs (what’s happened
   once can always happen again, right?) some nice decanters and a
   beautiful drawing of a lady holding a basket of apples. Under it, in
   Italics, is written : Fruits d’Automne. Next to the sentence is a
   drawing of a funny little man with a hat. I was immediately taken by
   the image, very nicely done, very carefree, very seasonal. Seasonal
   before it became a lifestyle, when it was simply life. I immediately
   decided to talk about the lady in the picture in my next blogpost – the
   timing was just so perfect, but she also made me think about our way of
   life. Now that we have lived in the countryside for 7 years, seasonal
   living has truly become a part of who I am and while I can still
   remember how it was living in Paris (and it was magical) I can’t really
   feel it. We cook with what we have and what we have is what’s in
   season. Writing a blog over a period of time, I’m sure I’m starting to
   repeat myself, thoughts much like fruits and vegetables are cyclical,
   but just like you can never eat the same apple twice – neither can a
   thought ever be exactly the same. We all feel a familiar feeling as
   Christmas approaches, we go through the same motions. Buying presents,
   setting up the Christmas tree, the old ornaments. Stocking up on
   Champagne, planning feasts. But something is always new, even if it’s
   just our own perspective … and in our case we usually have a new family
   member pretty much every year.

   This time I decided to do a very approachable menu, nothing too fancy,
   very tried and tested in this house. I think we’ve had all the dishes
   at least 5 times in the last few weeks. The ingredients are all quite
   humble, but of great quality and as it happens, very healthy. Kakis are
   some of my absolute favourite fruits and while I usually just have them
   plain after a big meal, when a light dessert is required, they are also
   wonderful in fritters. Talking about new thoughts, I was recently in
   Torino doing a special blend with our friends from the Vergnano coffee
   family in Chieri and one night we had dinner at the wonderful Al Gatto
   Nero restaurant. After indulging too much in white truffles, Andrea,
   the brilliant owner, who to me IS the place, suggested something light,
   Kaki. The way they served it was lightly soaked in Rum with a tiny
   dollop of ice-cream in the middle. It was as perfect an ending to a
   meal as any I’ve had.

   The salad was the first thing on the menu and the first thing I thought
   of. We’ve been enjoying it so much recently and a dear friend,
   Hrafnhildur from Iceland, who was here with my mother-in-law recently
   said “Not only is this the best salad I’ve ever had, it’s also the most
   beautiful”. That’s what I call a compliment. The Chicken Supreme is my
   favourite cut of chicken, the breast with the succulent wingbone which
   makes everything juicier. But for dessert I was hesitating. The lady in
   the drawing and her apples were calling me but I couldn’t quite put my
   finger on it. In walks Fabien (he literally walks in many mornings
   while I’m still in my pyjamas, to say hi and have coffee). I remember
   him saying years ago that one of his favourite childhood memories where
   those of his mother’s apple fritters (beignets). So that was sorted. As
   luck would have it, opposite his château is another wine making
   property with a glorious Kaki tree. Fabien told us he’d arrange for a
   permit from the owner to pluck some, he also promised to lend us a
   ladder. As you can see from the photos, he couldn’t find a ladder and
   brought a chair, which was good enough and as my husband would say,
   more photogenic. (you can see Fabien sitting on that chair next to his
   sister Véronique)

   As I’m writing this I must admit that I’ve missed writing these posts,
   I’ve missed you all, your comments and thoughts. It’s a special feeling
   I don’t want to ever lose. It also doesn’t hurt that I’m drinking
   Champagne and the kids are behaving. So are the dogs which is even
   rarer. And my husband is cooking dinner. Spaghetti with garlic an
   chilies, then pigeon. Then chocolates (he doesn’t do dessert). It also
   mean we’ll eat late, that’s one of his specialities, very late dinners.
   He recruits the kids, turns it into a game, spends more time selecting
   music than actually chopping. Then selects the same opera anyway. I’m
   not complaining.

   The fairytale

   Since last night I’ve been playing around with playlists. Trying to
   assemble a decent, alternative to the holiday music we always listen
   to. So far I’m advancing well. Some French touches – Michel Legrand
   etc. Some all time favourites like Elvis’s blue Christmas. A lot of
   sixties music – sometimes it feels like Christmas was invented in the
   sixties. It makes you think of posters of men with hats and pipes,
   opening the trunks of their Cadillacs and pulling out a box with a
   puppy in it. A puppy called Buddy, a gift for a boy called Jack. And
   what is Christmas without the carols? Click here to follow my playlist
   on Spotify, it’s called Mimi’s Christmas.

   This is where I was at until 10 minutes ago, then the phone rang. “We
   have found your puppy madame” said the lady from the veterinary clinic.
   I was stunned.

   In July, our beautiful Moneypenny had a litter of 8 puppies – Smooth
   Fox Terriers. Humfri Bogart, the king of the house is the father. We
   had 7 boys, all brown and white. One girl, black and white. They had
   just started going to their new owners when disaster struck in late
   September. The puppies had been left out later than usual, it was a
   balmy evening and they were playing under the olive trees and we had a
   dinner elsewhere with our workshop guests. When we came back one was
   missing. Nelson. He was the most outgoing, fearless. The handsomest of
   the lot. Had someone wanted to take a puppy they would have opened the
   gates and he would always have been the first one to approach. We
   searched everywhere, Thorir, Oddur & Mathias spent most of the night
   driving, cycling, walking around the village, the vineyards. Not a
   trace. For a few days we were hopeful then we just hoped he was fine
   even if we’d never see him again.

   And now this. A true Christmas miracle. He’s still at the Vet’s, it was
   too late to pick him up tonight as they were closing and my husband
   wasn’t here. But tomorrow will be so much fun.

   Just like Christmas in the sixties.

   Watch what happens in 2018

   Since this is the last post of the year I thought I’d share a few
   things. This time not a new baby – phew 🙂

   I’ve been promising a new site, Rue Loudenne. We are very behind I
   know. Sorry about that but it’s going to be worth it. Launch date is
   now firmly March 2018. It will be brilliant, and very different. But as
   I said before Manger will live on, four times a year.

   So many projects in the pipelines, many exciting collaborations, for
   example our coffee venture with Caffé Vergnano, the nicest coffee
   family in Italy who make the absolute best coffee I ever had.

   And a new cookbook slowly rising in the oven. As you know my heart,
   though French, has been beating in Italian for a while so an Italian
   cookbook had to happen. Next year we’ll do it.

   We’ve just had the ‘French Country Cooking’ cookbook come out in French
   recently (Éditions Hachette), and soon it will also be in Italian (@
   Guido Tomasi)!

   And what else? Well, our own cooking show, lots of gifts for sale, and
   of course our exciting workshops (that are nearly all fully booked!)… I
   just can’t wait!

   Merry Christmas and Happy New Year! Enjoy the playlist! Joyeux Noël!

   Much love, always, Mimi x

   ps: Louise and Gaïa’s dresses are from Bonpoint, and Little Audrey’s is
   from Liberty’s and that amazing little burgundy coat is from Amaïa.

   Jerusalem artichoke salad with spinach, red onions, radishes and
   walnuts

   This is perhaps the most delicious way to cook these small artichokes.
   They are crunchy and filled with flavor. The colours of this salad are
   exquisite, deep browns and pinks. This will be my Christmas salad,
   adding pomegranate seeds to add sweetness and the best red in the
   business.

   Ingredients:
   6-8 Jerusalem artichokes/ topinambours, cleaned and sliced
   1 large red onion, sliced into quarters
   A small bunch of radishes (preferably round ones), halved
   2 large handfuls of fresh spinach leaves,
   2 handful of fresh walnuts, halved
   A sprig of fresh parsley, chopped finely
   Extra-virgin olive oil
   Coarse sea-salt & freshly ground black pepper
   Balsamic vinegar (I like to use the crema of balsamic)

   Preheat the oven to 180°C/ 350°F

   Slice the Jerusalem artichokes vertically, halve the radishes and place
   on a baking tray. Drizzle with olive oil and sprinkle salt. Roast for
   15 minutes, (or until vegetables are golden) in the oven 180°C/ 350°C.

   Slice onions, halve the walnuts and add to the baking tray after 10
   minutes. Continue to roast for 10 to 12 minutes. Let the tray cool down
   and toss the spinach leaves with extra olive oil and balsamic vinegar.
   Season accordingly.

   Chicken suprême cocotte with autumn vegetables

   This is one of my favourite recipes this year. Always a crowd pleaser
   (this is especially for all my workshop guests who have waited so long
   for the recipe!), the chicken suprême (it’s the chicken breast with the
   wing bone attached) is so tasteful with the seasonal vegetables, and I
   love to use Jura yellow wine (le vin du Jura), but white wine will do
   beautifully too. Adding cream is optional, but everyone at home asks
   for it so it must be better! Make sure to add it last so you don’t cook
   the cream.

   Ingredients (serves 6):

   6 chicken supremes (chicken breast with the wing bone or chicken
   cutlet)
   5 carrots, peeled and sliced lengthwise
   4 medium turnips (navets), quartered
   2 parsnips (panais), peeled and sliced lengthwise
   200 gr peeled and cooked chestnuts, halved
   10 radishes, cut in half
   1 and a half glass of white wine
   Olive oil
   Unsalted butter, about 25 g
   Coarse sea-salt and freshly ground pepper
   A few sprigs of fresh parsley, chopped for garnishing

   Preheat the oven to 180°C/ 350°C

   In a large pot, heat olive oil and butter on a medium heat.

   Mix the flour with pepper and salt; dredge the chicken pieces in the
   flour mixture lightly. Brown the chicken on all sides until golden. Set
   aside.

   With the rest of the oil in the pot, sauté all the vegetables batch by
   batch until golden on all sides.All vegetables should be al dente.

   Toss everything together and bring to a high heat for 2 minutes. Add
   the white wine and stir everything together gently. Let the wine reduce
   for less than a minute. Season accordingly with salt and pepper.

   Place in the oven for about 10 minutes or until the chicken is cooked
   through. Stir in the cream (optional).

   Scatter lots of parsley on top.

   Serve immediately.

   Apple and persimmon beignets

   This is such an old-fashioned dessert, simple and delicious. What I
   love most is the flexibility of this recipe, you can use almost any
   fruits you desire. Un vrai délice!

   Ingredients:

   2 medium apples and 2 persimmons, sliced

   Prepare the batter:

   250 g/ 2 cups plain flour
   2 eggs
   200 ml/ 3/4 cup half or whole (full-cream) milk
   150 m/ 2/3 cup beer
   50 g/ 1/4 cup granulated sugar
   1 tsp vanilla extract
   1 tbsp rum (optional)
   1/2 tsp fine salt
   2 1/2 cups vegetable oil, for cooking the fritters
   Icing sugar/ confectioner’s sugar, to dust the fritters

   Mix all the ingredients for the batter together in a large bowl until
   you get a smooth consistency. Cover and set aside to rest for 30
   minutes to one hour.

   Heat oil in a saucepan, about 1 to 1 1/2 inch deep in the pan. To test
   if the oil is ready, fry a few drops of batter. If it sizzles and turns
   golden brown within seconds, it’s ready. Dip the apple and persimmons
   slices in the batter, drain slightly and fry in batches (about 3-4 per
   batch) until the fritters become golden brown, approx 2 minutes on each
   side. Remove fritters with pliers or slotted spoon and drain on paper
   towel. Dust lightly with icing/ confectioner’s sugar before serving.
   94 comments

November 20, 2017

   The Good Life

Forty shades of green

   Mr McDonnell’s way

   “Happy wife, happy life!” said Mr McDonnell as we drove (incredibly
   fast) in his Mercedes from Dublin to Limerick on a very grey but green
   afternoon in late October. It was his way of explaining why he had been
   prepared, on a Saturday, to drive 3 hours to Dublin airport and then 3
   hours back, all the way to Glin castle on the other side of Ireland.
   It’s not that he’s not a busy man, as owner of a great big cow farm
   there are things to do, even on Saturdays, but “I’m always happy to
   help”. And three days later, as he drove us to the airport, albeit a
   closer one, we had come to understand that his mantra is true of many
   of the Irish in general. They are happy to help!

   I had wanted to visit Ireland for most of my adult life and while it’s
   close enough to France, and even closer to England, where I lived for
   many years, I never had a good enough reason – sometimes you need a
   reason to do things, even things you desperately want to do. It turned
   out, in the end, that there were two reasons. Mr McDonnell’s wife,
   Imen, and her partner in crime Cliodhna. They’ve been doing their best
   for Ireland for years now, drawing attention to their respective home
   towns, local producers and traditions. Their joint enterprise, the
   beautifully named “Lens and Larder” is a collection of workshops
   usually co-hosted by them and people they invite, like Oddur and I, who
   also live and breathe in the world of food and photos.

   The venue was irresistible, a real castle with a rich history and
   glorious gardens. The promise of days filled with cooking and eating
   and a historic pub that allegedly serves some of the best Guinness
   stout in Ireland – and not much else. The last part was enough to
   convince my husband, that and the fact that they’ve recently discovered
   in Iceland that their heritage is much less Norwegian than previously
   thought but considerably more Irish. A genetics company in Iceland,
   DeCode, has found through extensive studies that the Icelandic nation
   is comprised of around 80% Norwegian men and as much as 60-70% Celtic
   women. Maybe not the most romantic statistic, quite a brutal one
   actually, but it goes a long way to explaining why Icelanders look less
   like Swedes and more like, well, the Irish.

   No sooner had we arrived at Glin castle before I was whisked away from
   my grand bedroom complete with a four-poster bed, an enormous, carpeted
   bathroom (incredibly practical when travelling with a 1-year-old) and a
   welcome bucket of Champagne to the loveliest dinner in the reddest of
   dining rooms. Our hosts that night were Catherine whose father was the
   last Knight of Glin and her actor husband Dominic West. We had started
   with a sloe gin cocktail (which I liked even if I am not a fan of gin)
   drunk out of teacups which was quite charming and eccentric, but soon
   moved on to the Bordeaux wine we had brought with us, several vintages
   of Château Lafon-Rochet – Merci Basile 🙂 – which everybody loved. When
   it comes to wine, nobody does it better than “us” Bordeaux people. The
   evening ended with a “professional” game of Charades, led of course by
   Dominic but by then I was safely tucked away in that four-poster bed,
   sleeping soundly with baby Lucian while the others moved on to Irish
   whiskey.

   A pub and kitchen garden

   Perhaps my favorite part of the entire weekend came the following
   morning when Catherine, a landscape gardener, took us on a tour of the
   family gardens, filled with centuries worth of exotic trees which,
   surprisingly, thrive perfectly well in rainy Ireland. She’s so
   passionate about her gardens, to which she’s adding and preserving,
   making it one of the missions of her life like her grandmother before
   her. Imagine an English/Irish beauty in a fairytale or a children’s
   book – that’s Catherine. My dearest souvenirs I take from her kitchen
   gardens. Classically seperated from the rest of the fields, so
   beautiful and practical at the same time – some of the best leafy
   greens and herbs I’ve ever had came from that garden and it’s inspired
   us to plant some new varieties in our own “potager” back home.

   The huntsmen (and their children) came out in full uniform to greet us
   and while there was no actual hunt that day we had a fabulous huntsman
   lunch, complete with mackerel, ham and hot toddies. In the evening we
   had a pub dinner, oysters and Irish lamb stew. The music that night was
   traditional and beautiful but perhaps the most beautiful sentiment from
   that evening came from the pub’s owner or caretaker Thomas
   O’Shaughnessy. He inherited the place from his father, a legendary
   figure, and while it wasn’t particularly his dream to run a pub (he has
   another full-time job and only opens when he can), he considers himself
   the caretaker of the place and his duty to preserve it. Later I found
   this quote from Thomas in an article about the O’Shaughnessy pub :
   “O’Shaughnessy was the name above the bar when I got it. And it’ll be
   the name above it when I go. That’s all I can do”. This is an endearing
   thought to me and I found a lot of encouragement in Ireland – people
   seem to understand and value their heritage which is paramount in these
   times of globalisation and consumerism. It isn’t easy to run a small
   business and a small village. But it can and must be done, and we
   should all support it.

   In the end we didn’t see much of Ireland, just a glimpse and a rosy,
   curated one at that. But we saw enough to want to come back very soon
   and one thing stands out above all – the green isle is truly green.
   Everything is so (in local speak) bloody green. I think I remember
   correctly that Imen’s husband told us Johnny Cash wrote his song “forty
   shades of green” as he was taking off in a plane and flying over
   Ireland. No wonder, that’s the impression you get, so so green and
   moist and inviting. Only thing is though, the shades are more like a
   million.

   Johnny Cash’s song is beautifully written, here are the lyrics:

   I close my eyes and picture
   The emerald of the sea
   From the fishing boats at Dingle
   To the shores of Donadea

   I miss the river Shannon
   And the folks at Skibbereen
   The moorlands and the meddle
   With their forty shades of green

   But most of all I miss a girl
   In Tipperary town
   And most of all I miss her lips
   As soft as eiderdown

   Again I want to see and do
   The things we’ve done and seen
   Where the breeze is sweet as Shalimar
   And there’s forty shades of green

   Green, green, forty shades of green

   I wish that I could spend an hour
   At Dublin’s churching surf
   I’d love to watch the farmers
   Drain the bogs and spade the turf

   To see again the thatching
   Of the straw the women glean
   I’d walk from Cork to Larne to see
   The forty shades of green

   But most of all I miss a girl …

   The ballad of Sam and Niamh

   Two people who I haven’t mentioned yet but had a great, positive if
   gently quiet influence on our days in Ireland were Sam and Niamh. They
   live across the great river Shannon in county Clare but had come across
   for a few days to help out with Imen and Cliodhna’s workshop. They made
   us the best breakfasts, lunches and dinners, cocktails and hot toddies
   but most of all they were just lovely. He’s a real renaissance man,
   good with his hands as they say and she works wonders in the kitchen.
   I’m hoping to lure them over one day to teach us a trick or two (my
   husband could use a tip or two when it comes to gardening and
   carpentry) but as they’re expecting a baby that will probably have to
   wait. One of my favorite things they made was a crab salad served on a
   fresh endive – I might add that recipe to this post later on – but for
   now, here is their recipe for the traditional Irish soda bread that I
   couldn’t get enough of during my stay at Glin castle.

   Traditional Soda Bread Recipe (see last picture in post)

   Makes 1 loaf

   Total time to make: 55 minutes

   Ingredients

   225 g/ 1 3/4 cupswhole wheat (wholemeal) flour
   225 g/ 1 3/4 cups all-purpose (plain) flour
   1 teaspoon salt
   1 teaspoon baking soda (bicarbonate of soda)
   50 g/ 3 tablespoons/ mixed seeds, such as sesame, pumpkin, or
   sunflower, or golden flax seeds (linseeds) (optional)
   25 g/ 2 tablespoons butter, softened (optional)
   1 egg
   375–400 ml/ 1 2/3 cups buttermilk or soured milk

   Preheat the oven 180C/ 350F

   Mix dry together and then rub in butter and add wet all in one, knead
   as little as possible. Sprinkle with seeds or oats on top and slit with
   a serrated knife down the middle. Just like a cake get it into the tin
   and in the oven ASAP

   Bake at 180C/ 350F for 45 mins.

   Stick in a pin in the middle and if it comes out clean, it’s done.

   Cool on rack before serving.

   Onwards and upwards

   Those who are interested in finding out more about what Imen and
   Cliodhna (or Climen as my husband likes to call them) can go to their
   site lens & larder. They are always plotting something and might even
   lure us back to Ireland in the spring – which is very tempting, we’ll
   see 🙂

   On another note, it’s worth mentioning that Glin castle, which has had
   many lives – one as a hotel – is potentially up for event letting,
   meaning that if you’re interested to head to Ireland with a sizeable
   group and play castle for a few days, then that’s utterly possible.
   It’s a dream I might add.

   And finally, regarding our own workshops here in Médoc (and elsewhere)
   since we announced last summer we’ve had an overwhelming response and
   most touchingly over 100 requests from people who want to or are at
   least considering returning. Many workshops are completely full but
   some have a little leverage (sometimes people change their plans etc) –
   so if you’re interested don’t hesitate to write and we’ll see what we
   can do.

   82 comments

June 26, 2017

   Life in Médoc

Workshops 2018

   WORKSHOPS 2018

   When we first visited the house at 1 rue de Loudenne, which was also
   the day we decided to buy it, we were struck by how big it is. It
   somehow looks smaller from the outside. Nothing really indicates the
   vast hallways, the countless large rooms. That day we knew we wanted to
   live here but also … to do something else, bring it to life. One of the
   ideas we had was to host workshops, bring together like-minded and
   lovely people who love cooking and eating, who love France, wine, the
   countryside, photography. People who love beauty. People who like to
   cook and eat all day, then go shopping for antiques, then cook some
   more, often with a coupe of Champagne in one hand and a whisk in the
   other. I was a little bit hesitant when we put up the first notice on
   my blog. Was it really a good idea, would people like it. Would we like
   them? Would anyone want to come?

   Now we are in our third year and it’s all gone swimmingly. It has long
   ceased to surprise me that the people who come here are wonderful. That
   they have a good time, that they take something valuable from the
   experience and that they leave a little piece of themselves behind.
   Something to remember them by. I think everybody takes something
   different home with them. Some recipes of course, but more than that.
   Memories of shared moments. An improved knowledge of Bordeaux wines.
   Dining and entertaining tips, perhaps how to be relaxed in the kitchen
   under a bit of pressure. How to have fun while hosting a party. How to
   make perfect meringues.

   I know a good deal about subjects I never thought I’d know anything
   about. Like how to get divorced in America or who to call if I need a
   wedding photographer in Norway. I know how to invest my fortune if I
   ever have one, who to call if I need reconstructive surgery. We’ve had
   a retired congressman, sommeliers, doctors, lawyers, dancers, artists,
   people of all ages, and occupations. A lovely man brought rice from
   Minnesota. A dear woman made me an artichoke in Bronze. Our guests have
   been lovely to our children, they have adopted some of our dogs. So
   many have returned and quite a few have bought houses in the region.

   Last year when we announced the workshops for 2017 I mentioned we might
   be doing less workshops in 2018. I had just given birth to my baby boy
   and as much as I love the workshops I felt I needed time to attend to
   other things. But now we are approaching the end of the spring/summer
   season of hosting the workshops and it’s gone so well, been so
   enjoyable and easy. It’s been just right and I’d love to continue.

   It’s been a pleasure meeting all of you and I’m sure we’ll meet again
   some day.

   Class of 2018

   Being in our third year we have found a formula we are comfortable
   with, all workshops will be 3 days like this year, the hours and prices
   for participation will stay the same. But one mustn’t get too
   comfortable, there is always room for evolution and next year we’ll
   travel a bit more, expand our horizons as it were.

   So here they are, next year’s dates. I hope there is something for
   everyone.

   April 11 -13, “The Spring vegetarian workshop”

   As always we’ll meet in the morning, cook together, have lunch – then
   take a small break. After the break we start all over again. It’s a
   perfect time of the year to focus on vegetables as spring brings out so
   much freshness after the winter. Asparagus (white and green), fava
   beans, peas, radishes, artichokes, chard, spinach, strawberries. These
   are the stars of this show and the menu will be 100% vegetarian which
   is a first for us. This year we did a similar workshop but included
   some meat so next year we’ll go all the way but keep it equally
   delicious.

   April 26 – 28, “The Italian cooking workshop”

   Our first foray outside Médoc borders will be in Piemonte, a region we
   have fallen in love with. The focus is on Italian, regional cooking and
   will be in association with local culinary talent. This means I must up
   my Italian game and I love a good challenge. We’ll meet in Torino and
   spend 3 days in the region together, with at least a day in our new
   favorite city. Local wines like Barolo and Barbaresco will play a part
   and we’ll visit some winemakers and producers. Piemonte is after all
   the home of “Slow food” and while all of Italy is bursting with great
   food, Piemontese cooking is very close to my heart.

   May 16 – 18, “The Basque workshop”

   This is a workshop I’m particularly looking forward to as it includes
   my friend and France’s finest charcutier, Eric Ospital. We’ll spend
   half our time in Médoc, cooking and eating in my house and the other
   half, including one night, will be spent in Basque country “Pays
   Basque”. Eric will show us around, we’ll visit his place where he cures
   hams for some of the finest restaurants in France. We’ll go to the
   beach, have a seafood dinner in St Jean de Luz which is a gem of a
   place.

   May 30 – June 1st, “The Summer wine workshop”
   As most of you know we live in one of the best known … and best period,
   wine regions in the world. This workshop will be dedicated to Bordeaux
   wines. We’ll have a guest sommelier, visit some friendly Chateaux and
   try more good wines than anyone should. Except they should 🙂 Most of
   the meals will be had at my house in St Yzans but there will be plenty
   of fun outings.

   June 20 – 22, “The Summer abundance workshop”
   Just like the early April workshop is a tribute to to spring, this one
   is a tribute to the glory of Summer. But with a lot of meat! This
   workshop will be all about peaches, apricots, cherries and barbecues.
   Expect a lot of decadent al fresco feasts, tables charged with pork
   roasts and duck breasts, creamy cakes, mountains of fruits and magnums
   of wine. This workshop will take place at our house in St Yzans but
   we’ll do some outings and fun picnics as well.

   June 28 – 30, “The photography workshop in Arles”

   In the past few years we’ve had the pleasure of visiting Arles
   regularly. To put it simply, it’s a cool town in a wonderful region, a
   happening place with a big heart, especially in the cultural sense.
   Vincent Van Gogh lived in Arles during a very productive period of his
   life and today the town hosts a great photography festival every year.
   We thought we’d head to Arles next summer, enjoy the burgeoning food
   scene, drink some local wines and most of all take photos.

   September 27 – 29, “The Italian wine & photography workshop”

   Next fall we’ll head back to Piemonte for second “annual” photography
   workshop. My husband Oddur will (literally) be in the driver’s seat as
   photos and wine are two of his passions. We’ll meet up in Torino, spend
   a day there and work our way through the vineyards of Barolo until we
   find ourselves on the Ligurian coast in time for a plate of Pesto. This
   time there will be limited cooking but lots of eating and drinking.
   We’ll visit winemakers but the focus is on photography. We’ll say our
   goodbyes on the coast so this is an ideal opportunity for those who
   want to extend their stay, head further south or lounge on the beach in
   Liguria.

   October 10 – 12, “The Fall Harvest workshop

   In Médoc, fall is the richest season of all, not only is all the wine
   being harvested which brings the region to life but this is the time
   when Médoc is flush with mushrooms, pumpkins and game. This workshop
   will all take place at our house in St Yzans but we’ll forage for
   mushrooms, follow hunters, participate in the wine harvest. The
   culmination will be an all day feast in the forest, enjoying the bounty
   of the season.

   October 24 – 26, “The Autumn wine workshop”

   Very much a replica of the “Summer wine workshop” but with a different
   tone as we’re in another season. “Bigger” food, and even more serious,
   older wines.

   All workshops are 3 days and the price for participation is 2.000 euros
   per person (with a few notable exceptions – workshops where we travel
   and the second wine workshop). Please note that all deposits are
   non-refundable. I find that to be a necessary step to avoid confusion
   and frivolous bookings. Should, however, something prevent you from
   coming at the date of your booking we would be more than happy to try
   to find other dates that suit you.

   As before we will be very happy to recommend accommodation near my
   house, we have a good list and good contacts.

   I will also be more than happy to answer any question regarding
   logistics and the best way to get here.

   Looking forward to hearing from you soon,
   Mimi xx

   For all bookings and further information please contact
   [email protected]

   Additionally if any of you can get together a group of 8 people I can
   arrange something outside the published dates for you, if the dates and
   stars align.

   31 comments

June 11, 2017

   The Good Life

On days like these

   “On days like these when skies are blue and fields are green” it’s hard
   to imagine that we were ever in winter or in early Spring. That there
   were ever days when the trees were bare, the vineyards grey and empty.
   The cherries in our garden have come and gone, the strawberries are
   retreating, the peonies struggling with the heat. White asparagus is
   becoming a distant memory and the broad beans are starting to wilt.
   Right now I’m drinking an iced, herbal tea – a real summer drink. Our
   tomatoes are just around the corner, as are the plums and peaches. Does
   life really go this fast? Did spring really happen?

   I guess it did because I have photographic evidence. Many weeks ago,
   just when we were getting very tired of winter, I planned a little
   spring blogpost. To celebrate early spring and all it brings. The
   cherry blossoms were at their best and I was playing with a few little
   recipes I wanted to share. A lot of our energy has been devoted to
   other things lately, workshop season, developing our new website,
   travelling. But here it is finally, a little souvenir of spring, of
   cherry blossoms before they were fruits, of branches before they were
   green. And two recipes that don’t really rely on seasonal ingredients
   so they can be made any time of the year. Two crumbles of very
   different origins.

   The opening lines of this blog post are borrowed from the song “On days
   like these” which features during the opening credits of the film “The
   Italian job”(written by none other than Quincy Jones). It’s played a
   big part in our lives recently as my husband loves it (too much).
   Recently he drove to Holland to pick up our brand new Bracco Italiano
   puppy and according to him he listened to the song on repeat the whole
   way up and down Europe. Which probably means close to a thousand times.
   From an Ipod without headphones or speakers (which probably mean he
   didn’t really hear it very well – that Land Rover is loud). I’m very
   glad I wasn’t on that trip but how glad am I that we got that dog. So
   beautiful and heartwarming. We let him sleep in our bed the other night
   which is the first time that has ever happened. You’ll see a lot of
   Monte Cristo in the future.

   RUE LOUDENNE

   I have been talking a lot about our new online magazine over the past
   year, made a few announcements that haven’t really come true. But now
   we’re ready. Within very few weeks we’ll be up and running. First a
   soft opening over the summer and then in full force from September
   onwards. This is not a hoax 🙂 You can find us at www.rueloudenne.com
   The title is borrowed from our address, a simplified version.
   We think of our house as a home and haven for our family but it’s also
   very much a house of food. A place where food, good produce & cooking
   is of the highest importance. I have been thinking about it for a while
   now, because people sometimes ask me, what is my message, what am I
   trying to do, to achieve? Of course I’m very fond of France, proud of
   it’s culinary traditions and happy to live here. I’m thrilled if people
   come to our beautiful region because they’ve found out about it through
   me. I love it when people like my recipes, find my books useful or
   entertaining. But none of that is really my message.

   The one point I would most like to get across is this. Cook real food,
   then sit down with your family and eat it. Simple as that. Of course
   it’s fun to get a little elaborate or go to lenghts sourcing the finest
   produce, even growing it yourself. But cooking doesn’t need to fancy or
   expensive to serve its purpose. A thoughtful, simple meal, enjoyed with
   your kids at the end of the day has never been more necessary or more
   in danger. The family meal needs a home. Rue Loudenne will do its best.
   But ours is not a preaching site, there are no taboos, no food
   snobbery, no exclusivity. It’s a “house” of food which is open to
   everyone who likes to eat and cook.
   Rue Loudenne will have entries 2-3 times a week, not just from me but
   from my friends, from my husband and from all sorts of people I admire
   and like. We will broaden our horizons, travel a bit. Recipes will be
   more accessible and better filed (so you can find all recipes for
   artichokes when they are in season etc). We’ll have current information
   about our events and activities, such as workshops, our future farmers
   market, pop-ups and special events we are planning. We’ll have an
   online shop, we’ll produce more things to sell ourselves. There will be
   a wine corner, a dog corner. Maybe even a cocktails corner.

   Mostly we’ll be there regularly and it will all be delicious.

   As for my beloved Manger it will not cease to exist but it will take on
   a less prominent role. We won’t change a thing but posts will be less
   frequent (ehrm if that’s possible). My idea is to do 4 posts a year, to
   celebrate each season. I have always adored writing and cooking for
   Manger but while our format has proven popular and successful it also
   comes with restraints. There are times when I simply want to share a
   lunch I just made, a story I heard.

   Manger has brought us together and given me so many opportunities.
   Without her (of course she’s a girl) I wouldn’t have done any of the
   things I’ve done, no cookbooks, no rue Loudenne, no tv show.

   She will forever be honorary chair lady of the food board – queen of my
   kitchen.

   Merci my friend …

   ps Very soon we’ll be announcing the workshop dates for 2018. As always
   we’ll shake things up a little bit, try new things. I hope you will
   like what we’re offering.

   The girls dresses are from Marie Puce Paris.

   Leeks with hazelnuts and goat’s cheese crumble

   25 g/ 5 ounces hazelnuts, ground coarsely
   6 medium-sized leeks, washed and trimmed
   2 garlic cloves, sliced finely
   1 tablespoon salted-butter
   1/2 glass glass of white wine
   1/2 glass chicken or vegetable stock
   230 g/ 8 ounces goat cheese (choose a firmer one, in the style of a
   brie)
   Two shallots, sliced fried until golden and crispy
   Olive oil
   A handful of salad (I used shiso salad)
   Coarse sea-salt and freshly ground black pepper

   Trim the dark green tops of the leeks and the roots and remove the
   outer layer from each one. Rinse under cold water. In a large pot, heat
   the olive oil and butter over medium heat. Add the garlic and cook for
   a minute or two. Add the leeks, season with salt and pepper, and cook
   for 5 minutes. Pour in the stock, then the wine and simmer to reduce,
   about 2-3 minutes. Lower the heat, cover and cook until the leeks are
   tender, about 10 minutes.

   In another pan, sauté the shallots in olive oil until golden and
   crispy. Set aside.

   Make the crumble:

   In a food processor, combine the hazelnuts and goat’s cheese, add a
   tablespoon of olive oil, salt and pepper. Pulse a few seconds until you
   get a crumble.

   In a small bowl,make the vinaigrette. Whisk together the olive oil,
   mustard and vinegar. Season with salt and pepper.

   Place the leeks in an oven-proof dish, and place the crumble on top.
   Place under the grill for a few minutes until golden. Pour the leek
   stock into a deep plate or bowl, transfer the golden leeks with the
   crumble, into the bowl, and scatter the salad (optional) and shallots
   all over. Drizzle with the vinaigrette and serve immediately.

   Cod with gratinée chorizo

   (for 6 people)

   6 cod fillets
   230 g/ 8 ounces chorizo
   45 g/ 1/2 cup tablespoons grated Parmesan cheese
   45 g/ 3/4 cup tablespoons of breadcrumbs
   15 g/ unsalted butter
   Olive oil
   Piment d’Espelette
   Coarse sea-salt and freshly ground black pepper

   Preheat the oven to 400F/200°C

   Fry the chorizo in a pan and cook on a medium heat until it becomes
   golden, about 3 to 4 minutes. Set aside.
   In a food processor, combine chorizo ​​with parmesan and breadcrumbs.
   Add softened butter and pulse until you get a crumbled mixture.
   Place the cod filets on a baking dish, generously smooth the crumbled
   chorizo mixture on the cod and place the dish in the fridge for 30
   minutes.
   Transfer the fish in the preheated oven for 10 to 12 minutes, until the
   cod is cooked through and the chorizo is golden and sizzling. Sprinkle
   a dash of piment d’Espelette and a drizzle of olive oil.
   Serve immediately.

   125 comments

February 22, 2017

   The Good Life

Double Fantasy, again

   chickenbeansandtajarin

   Last year Oddur and I had great fun with a little post we did sometime
   in January, looking back at the year behind us, remembering some of the
   things that stuck in our memory. Not necessarily the most important
   things or the highlights but the things we thought might be amusing or
   useful for you or at the very least not too boring to read about. The
   curious format we used was modeled after a favorite album of my
   mother’s – Double Fantasy with John and Yoko, where they take turns
   submitting their songs rather than collaborate on the same songs. I was
   John, he was Yoko and while he’s protesting this year – since it’s my
   blog he’s still Yoko. True to form all his entries seem to focus on
   dogs, or pasta or Italy but I kept mine a little more local.

   As I’m writing this I’m feeling a wave of optimism. After a cold winter
   we’ve been having glorious weather, the kids are on holiday and we’ve
   been preparing the vegetable garden for spring, pruning the olive trees
   in front of the house and we have even lounged on the rooftop terrace
   at least a month early. Everybody’s got a little color on their
   previously pale faces, we’ve replanted the rose bushes that the dogs
   ate (actually we re- re planted them as the dogs also got the ones we
   planted first) and we’re looking so forward to everything that’s coming
   our way – not least our new website that we hope to have ready this
   spring.

   Before we get on with the double “album” I wanted to say thank you to
   all of you who have taken the time to respond to my call to arms. In my
   last post I mentioned we were looking for help and we’ve received
   letters in the hundreds. So many good prospects and while I won’t be
   able to answer you all I wanted to say that no decisions have been made
   but I’m on it this week and next.

   Secondly I have a Manger Workshop announcement: Last summer we
   announced the 2017 workshops and immediately got incredible response.
   The most popular workshop this year (and most popular from the
   beginning) is the “antiques workshop” this April. I think I had to turn
   away close to 50 people, even after I squeezed in a few extra people to
   the very full workshop. I completely understand as I love antique
   hunting myself and there is nothing better than mixing it up with some
   good food and wine. So while we initially planned to host no workshops
   after October we’ve decided to add an extra workshop next November 29 –
   December 1st. These dates coincide with he Quinconces Brocantes in
   Bordeaux, just like the April dates.

   On top of that Oddur, who finally decided to do a photography workshop
   in May has decided to add another one in September 13-15 but this one
   will be held in Italy and not here in Médoc. There will be wine
   tastings as well and good food but no cooking unlike the one in May. He
   will be revisiting the setting for the story he wrote for CN Traveler
   this February. As he says himself “this one will be all action – not
   for the faint hearted, but for those who love an adventure”. ps there
   will be wine and dogs.

   If you are interested please write to [email protected] and we will
   send you more information.

   That’s all for now, I give you … Yoko

   tajarinstyzansminni

   tajaringattonero

   Tajarin – Inspired by Torino

   I am fortunate enough to love my work (if it is work at all) and while
   I prefer above all else to stay at home with my wife and kids and dogs
   … and wine cellar, I do love a short trip to Italy. Last year I
   traveled to Torino for CN Traveler (you can read about that here) and
   fell in love with the city. I’ve always traveled a lot to Italy but
   Torino had escaped me until last fall. While it would feel repetitive
   to recount all the reasons why I fell for the city, let me just tell
   you about this particular pasta dish:

   Sometimes magazines like to ask people about souvenirs they’ve brought
   home from trips etc. But I’ve always thought the most important
   souvenirs are not objects or even photographs. They are memories, of
   course, but if you can say after a trip that it has changed you in some
   way (for the better let’s hope) or that you learnt something, then you
   have really taken something worthwhile back home with you. And that
   something will always stay with you and will forever connect you to the
   place to which you traveled.

   I have always loved tomato pasta. I have made a version thousands of
   times – I guess everybody has. I’m actually quite good at it (and you
   won’t hear me praise my own cooking very often). But this one is a
   little different. It has to do with two things: Olive Oil and the type
   of pasta, the Tagliarini or Tajarin as they call it in Piemonte.

   It’s a little warped that I associate this pasta with Torino, tomato
   sauces aren’t really what the region is famous for. The restaurant
   where I had it, while old and by now quite Piedmontese is originally
   Tuscan. It’s called Al Gatto Nero and I spent a morning there taking
   pictures. It was a fine experience and while the kitchen was not in
   full swing they offered to make me a pasta dish so I could get some
   shots. They had tomato sauce ready so they just threw it together with
   some Tajarin and when we were done the pasta sat there in a bowl,
   getting cold. I guess Andrea, the proprietor, saw me glancing a the
   bowl so he kindly asked if I wanted to taste. I did. The rest is … an
   eternal quest to recreate it. Andrea saw I liked it and gently said,
   “it’s the best sauce in the world”. Not only was this true but when he
   said it, is sounded like a humble understatement.

   I never asked for the recipe, and I guess it’s more of a technique
   anyway. I’ve tried to recreate it many times and so far the results are
   encouraging.

   Let’s be clear about one thing – don’t try this at home unless you have
   Tajarin, dried or fresh.

   This is my version of “the best sauce in the world”.

   (My wife offered to assist me in writing this recipe. I was proud, I
   declined. The loss is yours).

   Slice one small carrot finely. Slice one small red onion finely. Pour a
   lot (hell of a lot) of good (but not great) olive oil into a large pan.
   Sauté the vegetables until golden or translucent or whatever words they
   use in recipes – about 10 minutes (sometimes I add chili flakes at this
   point – sometimes I also add a bit of white wine, neither is necessary
   and frankly the same goes for the carrots). Add one can of the best
   tomatoes you can find. When the tomatoes start to disintegrate (with
   the help of your wooden spoon) add about half a bottle of good Passata
   (you could of course use either just passata or canned tomatoes but
   this works for me and I’m superstitious). Let this simmer while you get
   the salty pasta water to boil and make sure the sauce doesn’t get too
   thick. When you have the right consistency add a good deal of fresh,
   coarsely chopped basil to the sauce and plunk the pasta into the
   boiling pot. Set the timer for 2 minutes (even if it takes 3 minutes to
   cook). Transfer the almost cooked pasta to the sauce (chefs would cook
   it in a strainer to make it easy) and add as much cooking water as you
   deem necessary. Once on the plate add some grated parmesan, a very
   generous drizzle of great olive oil to finish and serve. Hope your
   guests will like it.

   The result should be a pasta that has a noodle like quality, with an
   oily (but not too oily) delicious tomato sauce, that generously (but
   not too generously) covers all the pasta.

   If all this sounds to vague it’s because it is.

   This Tajarin is an idea, a challenge, there is no right or wrong, only
   results … and they better be good.

   vogueliving

   The Como Cover

   Wow, Yoko can really write a long text about a tomato pasta. But I give
   her this: it’s very tasty 🙂

   While I said my “songs” would be local I can’t start this album with
   anything other than the most important thing that happened to me last
   year. The birth of my baby boy, Lucian. He is a mother’s dream, an
   extension of me still. Motherhood can be demanding but no sooner is he
   out of my sight than I want him back in my arms. If practice makes
   perfect then let’s just say I’m mastering motherhood, sort of. Or maybe
   a better way to describe it would be saying, I enjoy it even more now.
   I know how tough it can be, but I’ve gotten used to it. I also know it
   won’t last forever and I want to savor every single moment. He’s my
   last one. I love him so.

   Speaking of moments, this particular one was as charming, improvised
   and organic as any I can remember. We had taken half the kids to Milan
   and decided to spend two days in Como. On our first night we had a
   lavish dinner at our hotel, the wonderful Grand Hotel Tremezzo, and I
   had dolled myself up for a big night. To make sure Lucian would stay
   out of trouble I decided to give him a little “drink” before heading
   down. Oddur came in and immediately went for his phone. “This is too
   beautiful he said”. At first I protested, I don’t usually allow picture
   of myself breastfeeding – I guess it’s my Asian private side. But it
   was a tender moment and I even decided, upon reflection, to post it –
   after all I think encouraging breastfeeding is a good thing.

   Strangely enough, that dimly lit photograph, shot with an iPhone, ended
   up on Vogue Living as a cover. They had seen it on my feed and while I
   warned them it was a rather low-res image they still decided to go
   ahead with it and I’m glad they did.

   There are moments of pure, unfiltered happiness. This was one of them.

   raimondcompilation

   raimonduno

   Raimond

   Back to Turin. I was coming back to Torino after a day spent driving
   and drinking in the Barolo wine region, about an hour’s drive from
   Torino. I had set up a dinner date with Mimi at a restaurant called Tre
   Galli, on my list to shoot and I was racing to catch the last light of
   the day. As I arrived outside the restaurant I could see it wasn’t yet
   open, the cooks were all seated together at a long table and at the
   head of it, a very imposing, well dressed, ruggedly handsome man. I
   approached from outside and instinctively “drew my camera”. As I
   entered, without asking for permission, I starting shooting the table,
   focusing on the man at the end. Finally I did what many photographers
   do, asked forgiveness rather than permission. I had caught the moment
   now I had to face the music. The music in this case was a sweet melody,
   Raimond, as the well dressed man is called, was very kind and even
   invited me to take more photos. It turned out that he’s just a guy from
   the neighborhood, friendly with the local restaurateurs and sometimes
   dines with them. I was keen to take more photos of him, in better light
   so we made plans for the following day. This time he showed up almost
   in costume and sat for a few more portraits. When we parted, he wrote
   down his name and details and even made me a little sketch of a naked
   woman on the backside of the paper. Raimond is an artist and a
   philosopher in addition to his refined sense of dressing. There is
   something very noble and quirky about him, they call him the king of
   his neighborhood. Less noble was the fact that I lost the drawing and
   details but I promise to make up for it when I return to Torino. I will
   bring a framed photo and copies of the CN Traveler issue. Raimond, if
   you are reading – outside my wife and children you were my favorite
   subject of 2016.

   The Playlist

   Last year so many of the people who have joined us for the workshops
   practically begged me to assemble a playlist with samples of the music
   we play during our workshops. I finally relented and while that
   playlist, now over a year old, goes in and out of fashion in this
   house, I think it’s a good tradition. So here it is, the Manger
   workshop playlist 2017, I hope you will enjoy it. Some of the songs
   we’ve been listening to for years, others have been suggested by our
   friends or workshop attendees. These are the songs that get us in the
   mood when the Champagne is flowing freely and the night is young.

   Yves Montand – C’est si bon

   Dusty Springfield – Take another piece of my heart

   Raspberries – Go all the way

   Gerry Rafferty – Right down the line

   Dalida – Paroles Paroles

   Charles Aznavour – Les Comédiens

   Chet Baker – I fall in love too easily

   Frank Sinatra – Days of wine and roses

   Gilbert Bécaud – Je reviens te chercher

   Peter Sarstedt – Where do you go to my lovely

   Lucienne Boyer – Parlez moi d’amour

   George Michael – Kissing a fool

   Dusty Springfield – Windmills of my mind

   John Lennon – (Just like) Starting over

   Frank Sinatra – Watch what happens

   Click here to get the playlist on Spotify.

   armagnacminni2

   Armagnac – A fling in the spring

   I keep raving on about Italy but it should be noted that France is my
   first love but Italy a close second. If we lived in Italy we’d spend
   our holidays in France and vice versa.

   It’s been rather well documented on this blog and in Mimi’s book, how
   much I like wine. Particularly Bordeaux wine. Particularly old Bordeaux
   reds from the finest vintages. I also love Champagne (that love is
   equally well documented). The liqueurs and digestifs and all that stuff
   is all wonderful but I’ve never really fallen in love with it and for
   that my liver will be eternally grateful. Having said that I did have a
   little fling last spring with Armagnac. We were spending easter in
   Gascony shooting a story on the region, in the company of a bunch of
   wonderful people. And those wonderful people were all drinking
   Armagnac. Not all the time, but in the evenings when dinner was over
   and we had all assembled in front of the fire in the grand red salon. I
   became very fond of my Armagnac those evenings in Luxeube and enjoyed
   nothing better than to nurture a glass or two while the more ambitious
   guests argued over the rules of parlour games they had created.

   Armagnac is a type of brandy that comes from Armagnac and it has to
   come from Armagnac. If you are sentimental about such things, and not
   too old, you can probably find a bottle from your birth year. Some
   people make a great fuss about such things (often the same people who
   are ambitious at parlour games) but the truth is that the best Armagnac
   often comes from assembling vintages.

   I haven’t had a lot of Armagnac since then (remember my pact with my
   liver) but once or twice for Christmas I broke my rule and that
   distinctive flavor, quite different from other brandy, is very
   beautiful and brings me back to that red salon in Luxeube.

   arlesprovence

   Rediscovering Provence

   It was a pleasant surprise to be asked to be the face and ambassador
   for the French cosmetic brand L’Occitane en Provence. I didn’t have to
   think twice, it’s a company with a good reputation and excellent
   products that I have always used throughout my life. L’Occitane comes
   from Provence in the south and the DNA and soul of the company is very
   linked to its birthplace. In spring I was invited to come and see their
   origins, the fields where they grow the various herbs and flowers,
   their aromatherapy insitute and their amazing spa.
   Everybody likes Provence but it’s so well-known, much more so than our
   beloved Médoc, that it’s easy to take it for granted. I hadn’t been
   down there for quite a few years but an added bonus to my work for
   L’Occitane was rediscovering this jewel of France, guided by the people
   who know it best. Walking through the blossoming fields of thousands of
   almond trees, heavily pregnant and flanked by my daughter Louise was
   one of the most remarkable experiences of last year. Lucian, who was in
   my womb at the time, actually went twice. A few weeks after his birth
   we were back on the road, this time just me and the boys for a
   whirlwind trip. We had a lovely night at the L’Occitane spa at the
   ‘Couvent des Minimes’, I walked in the lavender fields with Humfri and
   then we had a quick stopover in the magical town of Arles, so infused
   by artistic charm and history.

   It’s a reminder to not take things for granted, to rekindle old flames.

   popgoesmyheartminni

   Happy hour

   (Breaking the rule, still Mimi here – It seems I have more songs than
   my husband)

   It’s very rare, if it ever happens at all, that we don’t have some sort
   of apéro in this house. Come rain or shine, hell or high water,
   sometime before dinner we’ll be pouring something into a glass,
   enjoying something delicious spread out on the kitchen table, the
   garden table or even, on a clear day, on the roof. Often these moments
   include sausages and cold cuts, the debatable “grenier Médocain”, the
   very salty but irresistible smoked duck breast. Radishes with butter,
   carrot and celery sticks, crunchy duck skin with hazelnut dip, oysters,
   foie gras. In summer we’ll often have rosé or Champagne or rosé
   Champagne. In winter we’ll have Champagne or Reds. When Matt and
   Yolanda are here we’ll have cocktails, then Champagne. Sometimes we go
   alternative. Deep fried things like sage or pumpkin flowers. Or
   popcorn. Everybody loves popcorn.

   In the morning we love to have boiled eggs and soldiers and sometimes,
   when we have time, we drench the soldiers in a mixture of salt and
   rosemary and parmesan. That mixture is equally good when drizzled over
   popcorn and the kids love it. Oddur loves to make virgin Mary’s with
   the kids and they adore it.

   Something about a virgin Mary with a crunchy celery stick and even
   crunchier popcorn perfumed by rosemary.

   blackpuppycovertitle

   French Country Cooking

   Last year I wrote about the two impending births in 2016. That, in
   part, inspired the title “Double fantasy”. Lucian, of course, was born
   in June but my other “baby” – French Country Cooking only came out last
   October.

   I have written much on this blog about my second cookbook, which is
   partly devoted to the pop up family-restaurant we opened here in Médoc
   in the summer of 2015. In many ways the book wrote itself and now that
   I have had time to reflect I can say that I am immensely proud of it,
   happy that we made it all work but mostly happy that the recipes work.
   I always knew it would be a nice looking book but it’s only after the
   book is out there that the recipes start to get tried and tested, that
   the reviews come in. Almost every day I get a comment, an email or even
   a kind word on the street.

   It seems those of you have bought the book like the recipes and for
   that I am eternally thankful.

   ps: Observant readers will notice that this is not the actual cover but
   a similar one that was almost in the running. When Oddur was shooting
   John Ray for the cover (which was partly an accident) then Helmut (now
   Gustave) was also crawling about and got a shot at the limelight. In
   the end, though, we chose John Ray but here’s to Helmut nevertheless.

   vanityfairpup

   Vanity Fair Magazine (France) feature, March issue 2017. Out on
   newsstands now.

   The Insta Puppies

   Oddur here (enough with this Yoko business).

   Last year saw the birth of two litters of Smooth Fox Terrier puppies.
   We don’t really breed professionally and certainly not for financial
   gain (it’s a money losing operation if there ever was one). We do,
   however, have excellent dogs and would happily have many more if
   A. Space allowed B. Fox terriers were actually pack dogs and could get
   along with each other (the males get very territorial). The two litters
   we had were carefully planned and we meant to keep at least one or even
   two from last year’s batch. In the end it wasn’t to be. We decided
   against keeping a male (John Ray who is on the cover of the book and
   was our choice ultimately left us) as we have three others and while
   they liked him as a puppy things were bound to get messy. Then we
   planned to keep a female but fate threw us a surprise in the form of a
   bitch (the correct term) called Moneypenny who will be perfect down the
   line for Humfri, our finest dog. Adding two females was sensitive and
   now they are all gone. But what fun we had, they gave us good memories
   those puppies of summer. They also messed up the garden but that’s
   another matter.

   The silver lining in all of this is that they are all in great homes.
   Each of them found a great family, many in NY funnily enough, but we
   now have agents in London, Geneva, Paris, NY and Bordeaux. And many of
   them have their own IG accounts.

   Here are a few:

   @ardenpalaisroyal
   @pitalicious
   @johnraynyc

   Others share their accounts with their adoptive parents.

   Our next litter will be in 2018 and by then I hope the balance will
   allow us to keep one. Preferably one that’s the spitting image of
   Humfri which is the big idea.

   ardenandjohn

   chickenandbeans2minni

   The Chicken Suprême

   Last year I wrote that while this was not a traditional post I felt it
   needed at least one recipe. Oddur already took care of that with his
   Tajarin but I also have something up my sleeve. I have always loved
   simply fried chicken breast with sligthly crunchy skin and lately my
   butcher has started offering “suprême de poulet”, technically a suprême
   is a breast with the wing bone still attached, I just cut off at the
   tip. It’s even tastier and juicier than just frying the breast. Lately
   I have cooked this dish or a version of it for lunch, perfect and
   healthy for the colder months with nourishing, delicous beans and a
   crispy spinach salad on the side.

   Recipe

   6 chicken breast (with the skin), or in French suprême de poulet

   8 garlic cloves, slightly crushed and unpeeled

   450g/ 1 pound cannellini or other cooked white beans, rinsed and
   drained

   160 ml/ 2/3 cup white wine

   A bouquet of fresh rosemary

   Olive oil

   Fleur de sel  and freshly ground black pepper

   Preheat the oven to 180°C/ 350°F

   Drizzle the olive oil over the chicken and season with salt and pepper.
   Heat a large heavy sauté pan, add more olive oil, about 2 tablespoons.
   Add the chicken, skin side down. Once the skin is golden, turn the
   chicken and brown on the other side, about 2 minutes.

   Place the beans in the baking pan, drizzle the juice from the pan all
   over and season with salt and pepper. Transfer the chicken on top of
   the beans, scatter the rosemary and garlic all over. Drizzle a little
   more olive oil and the white wine. Place the baking dish to the
   pre-heated oven for about 8 to 10 minutes, or until cooked through. Be
   careful not to overcook the chicken or it will be too dry.

   Serve the chicken with the beans and garlic, drizzle a little olive oil
   and season if needed.

   monte

   The Count of Monte Cristo

   This time we have no baby to announce (thank god) although I have had
   great fun with the hasthtag #babyno9 which sends all our friends and
   especially my parents into a frenzy.
   There will, however, be an addition to this family in early summer.
   I have wanted a Bracco Italiano for years and almost got one last
   summer. Having done much research and many more observations on my own
   dogs I am convinced that such a dog will go nicely with what we have
   already. The theory being that a gentle dog like the Bracco won’t mess
   with the Terriers and that the Terriers, while all action, will be
   smart enough not to mess with a much bigger dog. My own experience and
   the experience of others has taught me this.

   Once again it will be the year of the dog in Médoc. The land of wine
   and roses.
   89 comments
   « Older

Elsewhere

   ____________________ Search
     * Facebook
     * Pinterest
     * Instagram

   © Manger. Powered by WordPress and Manifest

   Follow

Follow Manger

   Get every new post delivered to your Inbox

   Join other followers:

   Email Address_______

   Sign me up!
   #Manger RSS Feed Manger Atom Feed Manger » All about Asparagus Comments
   Feed Butter chicken & Peshwari naan The windmill in Blaignan alternate
   alternate

     * About me
     * My cookbooks
     * Contact
     * Life in Médoc
     * Recipes
     * Press
     * Workshops 2019

   Life in Médoc

All about Asparagus

by mimithorisson

   Asperge et vinaigrette

   April is the month for asparagus. They stick out their pretty little
   heads, as if to see that spring is really here and then they come out
   in force, taking over market stalls, supermarket shelves, restaurant
   tables and domestic kitchens. For a precious few weeks they even
   dominate the conversation in big parts of Europe. I just love the
   delicate flavor of a superb white asparagus, slightly nutty and bitter
   with a sweet aftertaste. Forged in darkness, protected from the sun,
   they have an iridescent pale ivory color with hints of pink and violet.
   I can’t think of a prettier hue, to me they are like porcelain magic
   wands found under a rainbow, somewhere out there.

   picking2

   stacking

   mimiasparagus

   monsieurbenard

   asparagusbox

   asparaguschat

   gold

   Which brings me to the delightful Monsieur & Madame Benard who grow
   some of the best white asparagus (asperges des Sables des Landes) I’ve
   ever had. Yesterday morning I was lucky enough to spend some time on
   their asparagus farm, learning all about asparagus growing and even
   more importantly, bringing home a basketful. The Benard’s are very
   lively people, fun to be around and full of pride for their earthy
   produce and the possibilities they bring to the kitchen. The asparagus
   looked so inviting laid out on the table, some of them so fine, so
   delicate, others more robust but more flavorful. We talked about
   cooking and countless recipes. Other customers pitched in with their
   ideas, a local doctor with very thick hair said that his favorite was
   green asparagus with morilles mushrooms, a lady and her husband
   preferred big white ones with Hollandaise sauce. In the end Astrid (Mme
   Benard) and I decided on three recipes. My favorite with poached egg
   and vinaigrette, her favorite wrapped in local smoked trout from
   Aquitaine and a classic gratin that I thought might please my
   mother-in-law who has just come to stay with us. Don’t we all want to
   please our mothers-in-law.

   Asparagus really is a regal vegetable (the privilege of kings and their
   court in days gone by), growing it requires a lot of work and it is
   always picked by hand. Watching Astrid and her team carefully going
   over the fields, excavating the asparagus one by one from the sand was
   very informative and the strenuous efforts behind each and every
   asparagus make me appreciate it even more. Which is why no part of it
   should be wasted. As I was leaving Astrid reminded me to use the end
   bits for a soup. Making that soup is a lovely way to feel thrifty and
   luxurious at the same time.

   I addition to their asparagus endeavours the Benard’s have just started
   growing apple trees, eight varieties no less. In a fortnight they will
   be in bloom and in the fall they’ve invited me for the harvest so well
   be seeing more of them this year.

   Merci Astrid! Quel plaisir gourmand!

   asparaguswithpoacedegg

   Asparagus with vinaigrette & poached egg (serves 4)

   For the vinaigrette:

   5 tbsp olive oil
   2 tsp mustard
   1-2 garlic cloves, ground
   1 & 1/2 tsp walnut vinegar (alternatively, you can use wine vinegar)
   Salt & pepper – for seasoning
   Mix all the ingredients in a small bowl.  Stir until the vinaigrette is
   smooth.

   For the poached eggs: 

   4-6 eggs
   1 tbsp white vinegar
   1/2 tsp salt

   In a shallow pan of boiling water, add 2 tsp of vinegar. Prepare your
   eggs by breaking them into little cups/pots so it’s easier to pour into
   the boiling water. When the water is boiling, pour in the eggs in
   different areas (maximum four at a time – or the water temperature will
   get cooler). Leave them alone, cover with a lid for 3 minutes, then
   check if they need a bit of ‘pushing and shoving’ to make their form
   rounder. You can use a large slotted spoon for this. Depending on how
   well you like your eggs cooked, 3 minutes should complete the task.
   When ready spoon each egg at a time onto a plate. Set aside.

   For the asparagus:

   A bunch of asparagus, depending on size count 4-6 asparagus per person.
   A handful of chives (chopped finely)

   Wash the asparagus under cool running water and trim away the bottom
   1/3 of the stalk. With a vegetable peeler, peel off the rough part
   (leave the tip intact).

   Fill a medium to large saucepan with water, about half way to the top.
   Add salt and bring to a boil. Add the asparagus and reduce heat
   slightly – cook for 10 minutes, or until crisp and tender, depending on
   thickness of asparagus. Drain and place on a serving plate. Place
   poached egg on top, drizzle with vinaigrette and sprinkle with chives.

   asparagusgratin

   Gratin of asparagus with cheese béchamel

   1 large bunch of fresh asparagus, approx 500-600 g/ 1 -1&1/2 pounds

   For the béchamel sauce.

   40 g/ 3 tbsp butter
   40 g/ 1/3 cup plain flour
   350 ml/ 1 & 1/2 cup milk
   ½ tsp ground nutmeg
   ½ tsp salt
   ¼ tsp black pepper
   80 g/ 3/4 cup grated Comté cheese (or any of your favourite hard
   cheese)
   80 g/ 3/4 cup grated parmesan cheese
   A small handful of fresh breadcrumbs (one slice of bread will do)

   Preheat oven 210°C/ 410F

   For the béchamel sauce:

   In a saucepan, on a medium heat, melt butter and add flour. Whisk until
   smooth and gradually add milk whisking away. Season with salt, pepper
   and nutmeg. Stir until sauce thickens. Off the heat, add grated Comté,
   parmesan cheese and black pepper, mix well until melted. Set aside.

   Wash the asparagus under cool running water and trim away the bottom
   1/3 of the stalk. With a vegetable peeler, peel off the rough part
   (leave the tip intact).

   Fill a medium to large saucepan with water, about half way to the top.
   Add salt and bring to a boil. Add the asparagus and reduce heat
   slightly – cook for 10 minutes, or until crisp and tender, depending on
   thickness of asparagus. Drain and place on a buttered oven-proof dish.
   Pour béchamel sauce over asparagus, drizzle with breadcrumbs. Cook in a
   preheated oven for 20 minutes, or until golden. You can place dish
   under the broiler for a couple of minutes towards the end if you prefer
   (it will brown faster).

   asparagustrout

   Trout & asparagus rolls (Mme Benard’s favorite recipe – for 4 small
   rolls)

   4 slices of smoked trout, about the size of a palm (alternatively, you
   can use smoked salmon)
   8-10 fine asparagus
   Black pepper, for seasoning
   Fresh chives, chopped finely

   Preheat oven 210°C/ 410F

   Wash the asparagus under cool running water and trim away the bottom
   1/3 of the stalk. As the asparagus should be quite fine, you don’t need
   to peel off any hard skin.

   Fill a medium to large saucepan with water, about half way to the top.
   Bring to a boil (do not add salt as the smoked trout is very salty).
   Add the asparagus and reduce heat slightly – cook for 4 minutes, or
   until crisp and tender.

   Divide/cut asparagus into 3 equally sized pieces. Place three to four
   pieces diagonally on each slice of smoked trout and roll tightly.
   Sprinkle with Comté cheese and cook in a preheated oven, on a high
   rack, for 10 minutes until cheese has melted and slightly golden.
   Sprinkle with black pepper and finely chopped chives.

   asparagussoup

   Asparagus soup (serves 4)

   400 g/ approx 1 pound asparagus (You can also use Mme Benard’s tip and
   use leftover peeled coarse ends – if the end result is a bit stringy,
   just pass the soup through a sieve).
   2 small potatoes, peeled
   1 onion, coarsely chopped
   1 litre/ 1 quart vegetable or chicken stock
   120 ml/ ½ cup crème fraîche (or sour cream or heavy cream)
   Salt & pepper

   Chop the asparagus coarsely, keep the tips and set aside. In a pot, add
   2 tbsp of olive oil, fry the potatoes and onion for two minutes, add
   the chopped asparagus (not the tips), stock, salt and pepper, bring to
   a soft boil and simmer, covered, for 15-20 minutes, until all the
   vegetables are tender. Towards the end, add the asparagus tips for 4
   minutes and remove them – set aside. Transfer soup to a blender and
   blitz briefly until soup is smooth. Add crème fraîche, reserved
   asparagus tips, stir and serve immediately. Sprinkle with finely
   chopped chives.

Share this:

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Pinterest
     * Print
     * Tumblr
     * Email
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...
   Published: April 11, 2013
   Filed Under: Life in Médoc
   Tags: asparagus recipes : asperges des Sables des Landes : France :
   Louley : Médoc : white asparagus

63 Responses to “All about Asparagus”

    1. Xochi says:
       April 11, 2013 at 7:50 pm
       Thank you Mimi! This is post is exactly what I needed to take
       advantage of all those wonderful asparagus popping up. 🙂
       Reply
    2. Crystal says:
       April 11, 2013 at 7:57 pm
       As usual, absolutely gorgeous! I just started following your blog
       and love it. I have shared several of your recipes with friends and
       family.
       The plate in the asparagus and vinegarette with poached egg recipe,
       is lovely. Where can such a plate be found?
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:52 pm
            Thank you Crystal! The best bet would be to look in a
            brocante/antique/flea market, where you can find lovely plates
            for specific usage. Good luck! Mimix
            Reply
    3. Lauren says:
       April 11, 2013 at 7:59 pm
       I have never had white asparagus! Your recipes look so delicious, I
       might have to go and find some. 🙂
       Reply
    4. juniwelt says:
       April 11, 2013 at 8:02 pm
       Wonderful pictures, i like asparagus and the lovly plate 🙂
       Reply
    5. Coulda shoulda woulda says:
       April 11, 2013 at 8:21 pm
       I don’t think I have seen a more beautiful and picturesque post on
       white asparagus! Just stunning visually and can’t wait for the
       London stock to be ready.
       Reply
    6. Katrine says:
       April 11, 2013 at 8:33 pm
       Love this post. I adore asparagus and will definitely try these
       recipes. Love the poached egg vinaigrette. Very French, no?
       Reply
    7. vicki archer says:
       April 11, 2013 at 8:34 pm
       Lovely Mimi…
       Particularly that you have met and seen M and Mme Benard’s farm… I
       do so admire the passion with which these French farmers look after
       their produce… it certainly shows and is in the taste… Thank you
       for more wonderful recipes… xv
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:47 pm
            Thank you Vicki! It’s such a pleasure meeting such earth
            loving passionate farmers. Such admirable dedication. Mimix
            Reply
    8. colleen says:
       April 11, 2013 at 9:04 pm
       i absolutely have to try the asparagus with bechamel sauce. i am
       salivating just thinking about it! 🙂
       Reply
    9. anita says:
       April 11, 2013 at 9:50 pm
       Dear Mimi,
       I love the care and attention of French producers, a care which is
       harder to source here unless you shop at Farmers’ Markets . Mimi,
       is white asparagus more of a regional preference in the Medoc to
       the green?. I just love the of simplicity of the your smoked trout
       wrapped around the asparagus. Enjoy this wonderful seasonal treat
       Mimi as this delicacy is not with us for to long. xx Anita
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:44 pm
            Bonsoir from Paris (am here right now!) The Aquitaine region
            (of which Médoc is a part of) is renowned for its production
            of white asparagus called asperges des Sables des Landes and
            asperges du Blayais. White asparagus is extremely popular in
            this region! Such a treat! Bonne soirée, Mimix
            Reply
               o anita says:
                 April 12, 2013 at 12:10 am
                 Fantastique Mimi!!!! Dites bonjour a Paris pour moi!!! I
                 hope everything is going perfectly for you. You deserve
                 this xx anita
                 Reply
   10. Nadine says:
       April 11, 2013 at 10:05 pm
       Oh Mimi, I love asparagus!! Especially the recipe “Gratin of
       asparagus with cheese béchamel” sounds very delicious. It’s a pity
       that we have no asparagus in Germany until now, as the weather is
       too cold. But when the season starts I will try your recipe. Have a
       nice evening! Nadine
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:28 pm
            Bonsoir Nadine! Oh, the gratin was a delight – simple and
            really tasty – a real hit with my family! Wishing you a
            bountiful asparagus season! Mimix
            Reply
   11. Cheri says:
       April 11, 2013 at 10:09 pm
       Such a beautiful, romantic view of life. Thank you.
       Reply
   12. Sugarprincess Yushka says:
       April 11, 2013 at 10:25 pm
       Thank you for the deep insight in this french asparagus farm you
       and Oddur gave me – I feel moved especially by the photographs of
       the workers. It must be hard work to pick those delicious stems and
       I hope that they also can afford to buy the delicious fruit of
       their labour. Besides, like always, I admire the way you describe
       the recipes. Your love for the meals you’re preparing is always
       shimmering through every line. Have a beautiful week with your
       lovely family!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:26 pm
            Bonsoir Yushka! Thank you so much for your kind words! You’d
            be happy to hear that M. Benard is very generous and all the
            workers get to go home with a copious amount of asparagus.
            Bonne soirée, Mimix
            Reply
   13. Amber says:
       April 11, 2013 at 10:46 pm
       I LOVE asparagus too! Mostly because it is a beautiful declaration
       that spring is finally here. My favorite way to eat asparagus is
       shaved in ribbons and simply tossed with olive oil, lemon juice,
       salt and pepper. Perfection!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:27 pm
            Thanks for sharing Amber! I just love to hear everybody’s
            favorite recipes! Mimix
            Reply
   14. Rowaida Flayhan says:
       April 11, 2013 at 11:28 pm
       Hi Mimi, Wow the asparagus looks amazing and delicious, I would
       love to try the Gratin of asparagus with cheese béchamel and the
       trout. Such inspiring recipes. Thank you xo
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:52 pm
            Merci Rowaida! Mimix
            Reply
   15. pvedesign says:
       April 11, 2013 at 11:39 pm
       I adore white asparagus. Love all the area and people around you.
       Your recipes are as tasty as they are beautiful. Love to know how
       you stay so thin. Chasing children and dogs?
       pve
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 11, 2013 at 11:59 pm
            Bonsoir! Living around so many farmers is such a gift! These
            asparagus were so fresh, eaten hours after they were picked,
            filled with all the goodness we need. You’re right, it’s good
            exercise chasing all these wonderful creatures around me 🙂
            Have a lovely evening, Mimix
            Reply
   16. The Enchanted Home says:
       April 12, 2013 at 12:36 am
       Love this post and love white asparagus! I had them yesterday and
       they were almost sweet they were so good, but that gratin is in a
       whole other league!! Yum…….I love how everyone from your local
       baker to the asparagus grower is so chic in that refined country
       kind of way…only in France:)
       Reply
   17. Zoe says:
       April 12, 2013 at 5:16 am
       I was reading about asparagus just the other day – apparently it
       has an incredible nutritional profile so it’s good to get a few new
       recipes in there Maybe the next superfood?! Beautiful, beautiful
       photos and post as always.
       Reply
   18. Marsha says:
       April 12, 2013 at 8:07 am
       Hi Mimi, thank you ever so much for this virtual voyeur’s treat of
       asparagus. And I too adore the special asparagus plate! My region
       of North Germany is also famous for its white Spargel, but as
       everything else this year, we will have to wait a bit longer to
       savor these delicate spears until the weather warms up some. One of
       the specialities here is to enjoy them simply wrapped in fine
       sheets of cured ham, but I also like them topped with an
       orange-flavored Hollandaise. Here, we are also very thrifty and use
       all the shaved peelings along with the tips in the soup! ;o)
       Reply
          + Marsha says:
            April 12, 2013 at 8:11 am
            I meant, of course, to say along with the ‘ends’! I think your
            idea with smokes trout sounds delicious – as soon as ours are
            ready, I will try this. Liebe Grüsse, Marsha
            Reply
   19. Meital says:
       April 12, 2013 at 8:49 am
       Asparagus, such a delicate vegetable…
       I wish we had white asparagus around here, but I’ll have to sattle
       with the fine green ones:)
       Reply
   20. Favourite posts this week | Bake 'n' Shake says:
       April 12, 2013 at 9:50 am
       […] So excited for this years first asparagus! Will be trying some
       of these recipes as soon as I […]
       Reply
   21. Lila rose says:
       April 12, 2013 at 10:14 am
       Magnifique reportage sur ce produit pas si facile a faire pousser.
       Bravo pour les photos. Je salive rien qu’a regarder le gratin ….
       Reply
   22. margie says:
       April 12, 2013 at 3:15 pm
       we recently enjoyed pickled asparagus on a charcuterie board.
       delicious.
       Reply
   23. LA CONTESSA says:
       April 12, 2013 at 4:27 pm
       YOU AND YOUR PLATES!STUNNING!FLEA MARKETS OR FAMILY HEIRLOOMS?
       Reply
   24. The Omnivore says:
       April 12, 2013 at 7:38 pm
       Quelles belles photos! White asparagus is what I miss most from
       springtime in Paris.
       Reply
   25. Sweet Life Farm says:
       April 12, 2013 at 11:54 pm
       Merci! I have just returned from the local honor-system farmstand
       with asparagus in hand! The gratin pleases me too.
       Reply
   26. Springtime Recipes From Top Food Blogs | Beso.com says:
       April 13, 2013 at 1:01 am
       […] House In The Hills; TUSCAN KALE SALAD  WITH CHICKPEAS AND
       SPRING ONIONS, The First Mess; A LESSON IN ALL THINGS
       ASPARAGUS, Manger; SMOKY BEET BURGERS, Sprouted […]
       Reply
   27. Bonnie Sakoff says:
       April 13, 2013 at 9:38 pm
       I absolutely love your beautiful blog! The asparagus section is
       gorgeous! It made me want white asparagus that I had in Germany in
       a little town near Heidelberg! it was so delicious! Love your
       recipes!
       Reply
   28. Shannon O'Donnell says:
       April 13, 2013 at 9:46 pm
       Like others here, I have never had white asparagus, but I love the
       photos showing the food’s journey to the plate — beautiful! 🙂
       Reply
   29. benard says:
       April 14, 2013 at 10:38 am
       merci mimi
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 14, 2013 at 1:37 pm
            Avec grand plaisir Astrid! Merci encore une fois pour votre
            accueil chaleureux – vos asperges sont vraiment magnifiques –
            un grand moment de pure gourmandise! Nous avons beaucoup aimé
            votre recette avec les tranches de truites. A bientôt – je
            passerai pour sûr cette semaine. Bon dimanche, surtout avec ce
            temps de rêve! Mimix
            Reply
   30. Zelda says:
       April 14, 2013 at 5:00 pm
       It’s great that you are showcasing wonderful local produce, Mimi.
       The recipes look delicious, thank you!
       Reply
   31. Anita Rivera says:
       April 14, 2013 at 7:07 pm
       Quel plaîsir, bien sûr!
       Vos photos Madame sont exceptionelles. Merci! Anita
       Reply
   32. La Torontoise says:
       April 14, 2013 at 11:17 pm
       J’adore des asperges!
       So wonderful pictures.
       And so simple and delicious recipe!
       Thank you!
       Reply
   33. Marija says:
       April 15, 2013 at 1:24 am
       Quelle bonne idée de nous présenter de petits producteurs! Bravo!
       Reply
   34. Sherry says:
       April 15, 2013 at 10:03 am
       I look forward to asparagus as one of the first signs of spring.
       I love dishware and especially unusual dishware like your asparagus
       plate. It gets to be a real problem because I’m running out of
       cupboard space!
       Reply
   35. Ásdís says:
       April 15, 2013 at 10:45 am
       What a lovely post Mimi! I have yet to buy the first ‘botte
       d´asperges’ of the year here at the Côte d´Azur but when I do, I
       will try out Mme Benard´s recipe with the trout. Thank you!
       Reply
   36. Irina says:
       April 17, 2013 at 5:45 am
       Love your recipes, Mimi. The idea of adding asparagus ends into
       soup is wonderful. I always feel bad about throwing them away. Now
       I know 🙂 Thank you, Astrid and Mimi!
       Reply
   37. Rosemary says:
       April 17, 2013 at 6:06 pm
       I never seem to get to cook asparagus because I like it so much
       raw! I just break off the woody part and dip it in a little
       vinaigrette. But now at least I will always use the ends for soup!
       Reply
          + La Torontoise says:
            April 18, 2013 at 1:21 am
            I also love asparagus raw and I feel now so happy to know
            there are other people who appreciate it this way:-)
            Reply
   38. Valerie says:
       April 21, 2013 at 1:32 am
       I had the pleasure of sharing your site to my students this past
       week! As we are studying culture & cuisine françaises your site is
       really perfect for showing traditions, food, and the high value
       placed on good food, and sourcing locally. As a class we went
       through this post, then onto the snail farm, and then on to pigeon
       pie… I love the month focus (September is for Snails, April is for
       Asparagus…I hope you do more of those!). Your posting on snails is
       the best I have found so far on the web. Through your
       experiences-the photos, prose, & recipes my students understood the
       special role of food in French culture that is inspiring from the
       perspective of a college-aged American student …it was exciting for
       me (as a teacher) to see them get the picture regarding la cuisine
       française–the people, the food, the places. I will continue to use
       your blog in my classroom….merci mille fois…!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 22, 2013 at 12:06 pm
            Bonjour Valérie, Thank you for such a wonderful comment! I am
            honored that you shared ‘Manger’ with your students, and I
            hope they enjoyed the little gourmand escape to France. It is
            always so exciting to visit our local farmers and artisans,
            discovering their passions, their lives and favorite recipes
            of course. We try our best to document these special moments,
            and share our love for food, family and life! It really warms
            my heart that you appreciate this. I will be visiting more
            farmers this month, so stay tuned. La cuisine, c’est le
            partage, la vie, l’amour! Have a lovely week, Mimix
            Reply
   39. The Junk Drunk says:
       April 25, 2013 at 10:43 pm
       This looks delicious. I’ll try adding potatoes with my next batch
       of asparagus soup. Recently, I made a pureed green veggie soup from
       asparagus, broccoli and kale too.
       http://thejunkdrunk.wordpress.com/2013/04/25/deep-stir-green-soup-w
       ith-pureed-asparagus-broccoli-kale/
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            April 26, 2013 at 8:40 am
            Tha sounds so good! Thanks for the tip, I will try! Mimix
            Reply
   40. Links I Love – Recipes Edition says:
       June 5, 2013 at 3:01 pm
       […] It’s all about the poached egg.  And the asparagus (above). […]
       Reply
   41. Maia says:
       June 18, 2013 at 8:22 pm
       These are absolutely gorgeous. One of my favorite posts in a
       photographic sense.
       Reply
   42. Amy says:
       October 4, 2013 at 1:37 am
       Oh, how I miss my asparagus! I had them growing in my little
       potager garden in Houston and harvested my first spears just before
       we moved to Austin. It’s so dry here. I have yet to add asparagus
       to the garden.
       Reply
   43. Laurie says:
       January 22, 2014 at 2:59 pm
       Hi MiMi! I love your site and just found it recently. I made the
       asparagus soup last night and loved it! I topped it off with
       homemade parmesan croutons with a side of venison summer sausage.
       So delicious on a bitterly cold evening. Thank you!
       Reply
   44. 25 Recipes for a Delicious Easter - 3 guilty pleasures says:
       April 20, 2014 at 12:39 am
       […] Gratin Of Asparagus With Cheese Béchamel Mimi Thorisson/Manger
       Get the Gratin of Asparagus with Cheese Béchamel recipe from […]
       Reply
   45. Zosia says:
       May 10, 2014 at 3:17 am
       Hi Mimi,
       Would it be possible to replace white asparagus with green in the
       soup recipe? Unfortunately there is no white asapargus in my area
       and I am not sure how they compare,
       Cheers
       Reply
   46. thefolia says:
       March 27, 2015 at 2:51 am
       I just made the soup, however, I needed to add a little protein so
       instead of potato I added some cashews. I topped it off with a
       fried egg and some fresh thyme and called it a meal. A big touché
       to you for making all of the above!
       Reply
   47. bob says:
       June 21, 2016 at 7:46 pm
       instead of cutting a third off, bend them until they snap., let
       nature decide ! save the bottom portion for soup .
       i would recommend boiling with the peelings .
       Cheeers !
       Reply
   48. Rachel says:
       February 4, 2017 at 4:02 am
       i make asparagus with a similar vinaigrette, only with walnut
       mustard, no garlic, and a generous pinch of saffron! vey lovely on
       a white fish too, like a mackerel.
       Reply
   49. Here’s Why White Asparagus Is The Vampire Of The Vegetable World –
       Vegansta says:
       April 30, 2017 at 10:46 pm
       […] White Asparagus With Vinaigrette And A Poached Egg Get the
       White Asparagus with Vinaigrette and a Poached Egg recipe from […]
       Reply

   Leave a Comment

   Name: Required ____________________ Email: Required, not published
   ____________________ Homepage: ____________________
   Comment:
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   Cancel Reply
   Post Comment

   « Previous Post
   Next Post »

Elsewhere

   ____________________ Search
     * Facebook
     * Pinterest
     * Instagram

   © Manger. Powered by WordPress and Manifest

   Follow

Follow Manger

   Get every new post delivered to your Inbox

   Join other followers:

   Email Address_______

   Sign me up!

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
   #Manger RSS Feed Manger Atom Feed Manger » MEMORIES OF MILANO Comments
   Feed Oh So Quiet in Saint Yzans Food & Wine alternate alternate

     * About me
     * My cookbooks
     * Contact
     * Life in Médoc
     * Recipes
     * Press
     * Workshops 2019

   The Good Life

MEMORIES OF MILANO

by mimithorisson

   gaiazucchini

   Trattoria Masuelli

   “Don’t eat so much” my husband said as I greedily devoured my third
   mozzarella di bufala bruschetta. “I can’t, it’s too good” I said, part
   of me slightly angry at his impudent comment, part of me completely
   agreeing with him, we were after all going to a big dinner at what my
   husband had promised would be an amazing restaurant. So I resisted my
   fourth, finished the Barolo and we went looking for a taxi. As I was
   leaving my table I kept looking at that last bruschetta, the mozzarella
   so beautiful, glistening with olive oil. I wonder what happened to you
   my little beauty, I’d like to think the sad-looking lady who had
   finished her plate but politely declined the bruschetta when I offered
   it to her, cheekily grabbed it when we were out of sight. In fact I’m
   sure she did, it was after all irresistible.
   I was still hungry in the taxi, upset about the mozzarella, worried
   that what would come next wouldn’t measure up. As the taxi ride grew
   longer my patience grew shorter. My husband could sense that. “It’s
   about two minutes now according to the map” he said. Unfortunately for
   him the driver spoke good English. “No no, it’s about quarter of an
   hour … or more, depending on traffic”. The look on Oddur’s face:
   worried. Our first night in Milano, a weekend escape. Hundreds of
   amazing restaurants to choose from – and a difficult lady to please.
   The stakes were as high as they get in our little culinary club of two
   – the one who chooses the restaurant gets the glory, or the blame. The
   uncertainty didn’t last long though, as soon as I spotted the
   restaurant from my window I knew I’d like it, Oddur knew it too. We
   walked in where rows of empty tables greeted us. It didn’t matter. We
   know enough about restaurants to understand that we’d be OK. This
   restaurant could be spectacular, it could be great but it would never
   be worse than good.
   They seated us in a little room with three tables. Four elderly people
   were sitting at one of them, the men wore suits, they were having
   Prosecco and antipasti. The ladies had big glasses and bigger hair.
   Whenever I see people like that at a restaurant I know I’m probably in
   the right place, these people seemed to have been coming here for
   years, they seemed to love the food. Hip and trendy eateries can be
   great fun, new places with inventive cuisine and conceptualised décor
   can be so good, but 90 years of history is hard to beat. Especially in
   Milano. We started with incredible lard and the creamiest mashed
   potatoes, we had home-made yellowtail fish ravioli with fish stock and
   fresh thyme, and costoletta alla Milanese. The obligatory risotto alla
   Milanese and mascarpone cream. The big room at the front filled up
   quietly with a large group of Sicilians and somehow we ended up talking
   to them all. When they found out I was cooking at the food festival the
   following Sunday they all stood up and applauded. It was magic, Italian
   magic.

   A short note from my husband:

   I agree with everything my wife has just said but have to apologize
   that there is no photographic record of our visit apart from a few
   snaps on Instagram. That night I had no camera. Having said that I have
   no regrets either. Henri Cartier-Bresson once said that taking pictures
   without a camera is just as good. I couldn’t agree more. That night I
   took plenty, for myself. Some of them were of food. Some were of the
   room. Most of them were of my wife.

   mimipotager

   honey&parmesan

   mimicheers

   zucchini2

   A good Frenda in Milano

   So what were we doing in the Italian capital of fashion? I had been
   invited by my good friend Angela Frenda, the food editor of Corriere
   della Sera, to cook at the very fun, very stylish food festival, Cibo a
   Regola d’Arte. We arrived on a Friday afternoon, lugged our suitcases
   through the cobbled streets of Milan, sipped coffee in at least 4
   different places before we ended up in our hotel. It was Audrey’s first
   trip abroad and her favorite thing was the carpet in the hotel room and
   the very curious minibar. The rest of it, for her, was just like home.
   You already know what we did our first night out but our second meal,
   discounting a very forgettable hotel breakfast, was at one of our
   favorite spots, Antica Trattoria della Pesa, a place we always visit
   for the local standards, Costoletta Milanese, Osso bucco, Risotto
   Milanese, Vitello tonnato etc. Oddur spilled his wine and blamed
   Audrey, even faked photographic evidence to support his story (she was
   sitting on my lap when he dropped his glass). I left him photographing
   the rooms and rushed off to a hairdresser I had found in a nearby
   street. I always do my own hair but I thought – when in Milan … I asked
   for simple but I got glamorous! When I reappeared on the streets of
   Milan I felt like a contestant in Miss World, albeit 20 years too late.
   I guess big hair is big in Italy.
   That night Angela was celebrating the publication of her cookbook
   “Racconti di Cuccina”, a wonderful book, filled with deliciousness – if
   any of you speak Italian don’t even think twice, order it now. The
   great Sicilian chef, Filippo la Mantia threw her a party that night and
   while everything tasted great the standout for me was his own take on
   the Sicilian classic with aubergine caponata … All that glorious food
   was wonderful but on a personal note the real standout of the evening
   was the person seated next to me, the great Rosita Missoni. My first
   ever dress was a Missoni, I was wearing a Missoni dress the night I met
   my husband and thankfully that night in Milan when I met her I was
   wearing my favorite Missoni skirt … sometimes the stars align.
   #myfashionicon

   zucchini

   lemonicecream


   biscotti

   Our second breakfast was far more memorable than the first, following a
   tip from the girls at “Milano Secrets” @milanosecrets we braved our
   concierge’s declaration of “impossiblile” (he was talking about the
   congested streets filled with marathon runners) to get a taxi and head
   to Pasticceria Marchesi for coffee. Our taxi driver was much more
   optimistic “cinque minuti” he said. Cinque turned out to be Italian for
   40 minutes but the coffee was well worth it. It was exactly the sort of
   place I love to find in Italian cities, old-fashioned décor and as it
   turned out, old-fashioned clientèle. We met and fell in love with a
   bunch of guys, Aldo, Michael, Francesco … who come here every day for
   morning cocktails! MORNING COCKTAILS!!! The most surprising thing about
   them was not their charm, not their sense of dressing but the fact that
   they were fans of my blog Manger. I was humbled.

   That night it was my turn to dazzle the crowds. Or at worst avoid
   humiliating myself. I chose something simple and fast, pan-fried
   scallops. The gods of Italy decided to play a little trick on me and
   the equipment, which didn’t work, but I think I pulled it off, at least
   no one complained. Afterwards I enjoyed watching Massimo Bottura, one
   of the most respected chefs in Italy, make his famed tortellinis. I
   even got to eat a whole plate. Delicious. One of the great pleasures of
   that evening was to discover that my cookbook “A Kitchen in France” had
   already been translated into Italian. It’s called “La Mia Cucina in
   Campagna” and I love it!

   The last scene of this trip takes place at an airport, Oddur and I,
   overweight as always, trying to rearrange our suitcases and debating
   what to keep. We had kept our cool in the fashion meccas but totally
   lost it in all the food stores. Suitcases were filled with everything
   from various pastas to biscotti, to anchovies (they leaked), to a
   bottle of red wine with a little bird on it (It’s called I Sodi di San
   Niccolo – I chose it because of the label and it turned out to be one
   of the best Italian wines I’ve ever had – so much for not judging a
   book by it’s cover). We stopped short of eating out of our suitcases to
   lighten the load but we came close.

   Ciao Italia, we’ll be back soon!


   icecreammaking

   anticatrattoria

   zab

   When I think of Italian cooking, hundreds of flavors and foods come to
   mind. And when I try to shorten the list it’s impossible. There are
   just too many good things I associate with Italy. But if I had to pick,
   if I had to make a very short list lemons would be on it and zucchini
   flowers would be on it too. Memories of holidays on the Amalfi coast
   are filled with lemon trees, lemon-infused fish and delizia al limone.
   Zucchini flowers have pleased my eyes and pleased my palate more times
   than I can possibly remember. So beautiful on market tables, so
   pleasurable on a restaurant table. I’ve fried them in rented villas in
   Toscana and Marche, enjoyed them on the balconies of impossibly
   charming hotels in Ravello and Rome. Strangely enough I’ve never really
   made them at home in France. What happens on tour stays on tour! A
   couple of Sundays ago we made a feast of it all, picked fresh zucchini
   flowers from our garden, had Italian wine, and finished with Passito di
   Pantelleria and biscotti (the ones we didn’t eat at the airport).
   Talking of Lemons, a few weeks ago I came up with this recipe for lemon
   & saffron ice-cream as a part of my monthly contribution to French
   ELLE. I loved it so much that I have made it for every workshop since
   and I’ve been dying to share it with all of you. Now that the ice cream
   is out in ELLE I am finally at liberty to post it her and I am doing so
   with pleasure.
   There are only so many things in life a girl can count on.
   This ice cream is one of them!

   milanomarket

   merchant

   dogonthewall

   audrey

   And finally on a practical note:

   This blog, my beloved Manger, has unfortunately been suffering from too
   many other activities. Is that the beginning of the end someone might
   ask?
   The answer to that is no. I am currently redesigning the blog (a very
   cautious redesign) so that in the very near future we’ll have an
   updated version. I am going to keep it very minimal, with big posts
   like this one at least once a month. But I feel it’s important to post
   more regularly so we’ll introduce new sections and, from time to time,
   new contributors who will make sure we have fresh content at least
   twice a week. I am excited about this and I hope you are too 🙂

   Regarding the workshops, we’ve had so much fun since March and though
   we are technically fully booked throughout the year I have decided to
   add a few places to the groups as we now have more room and bigger
   space. We recently had a group of 9 that was so wonderful it has
   inspired me to be more flexible in numbers. So if any of you are
   interested to join the fall classes don’t hesitate to contact me at
   [email protected]

   anticatrattoria4

   stain2

   anticatrattoria3

   anticatrattoria2

   marchesi2

   fellas

   cocktail

   coffee

   marchesi

   italianbook

   italianfeast

   zucchinifritters

   Zucchini flower fritters stuffed with mozzarella & anchovies
   (for 10 flowers approx.)

   Approx. 10 zucchini flowers
   300 g/ 2 & 1/2 cups plain flour
   125 ml/ 1/2 cup of ice-cold beer to make a sticky thick batter – not
   too liquid, not too thick – it should coat the zucchini flower).
   1 ball of mozzarella cheese
   10 good-quality anchovies

   Sift the flour and salt together in a bowl. Whisk in the beer until
   combined and allow to rest for at least 10 minutes.
   Gently open each zucchini flower and remove the stamen. Wash gently and
   pat dry with a paper towel.
   Stuff each flower with 1 anchovy (or half, depending on the size of the
   flower) and a piece of mozzarella; dip the flowers in the batter and
   fry them in hot olive oil. Drain on kitchen paper , season with salt
   and serve immediately.

   icecream2

   icecream3

   So creamy, you’ll be chuffed.

   Lemon & saffron ice-cream

   (no ice-cream maker needed)

   (serves 4-6)

   Preparation: 10 minutes
   Freezing time 6 to 8 hours

   300ml/1 & 1/4 cup whipping cream
   250g/2 & 1/2 cups icing sugar
   80 ml/ 1/3 cup of fresh lemon juice
   Zest of 3 lemons, organic
   1/2 teaspoon saffron, diluted in a few drops of hot water

   In a bowl, mix the icing sugar, saffron and lemon juice. The mixture
   should be smooth.
   Grate the zest of 3 lemons.
   In another bowl whisk the cream with an electric mixer until it
   thickens. Add the mix icing sugar / lemon / saffron and zest and
   continue to whip – the cream should be thick and fluffy.
   Pour the cream into a freezer-proof container and cool in the freezer
   for at least 6 to 8 hours.
   With Angela Frenda, Rosita Missoni and Massimo Bottura.

   With Angela Frenda, Rosita Missoni and Massimo Bottura.

Share this:

     * Facebook
     * Twitter
     * Pinterest
     * Print
     * Tumblr
     * Email
     *

Like this:

   Like Loading...
   Published: June 15, 2015
   Filed Under: The Good Life
   Tags: Cibo a Regola d'Arte : f : La mia Cucina in Campagna : lemon &
   saffron ice-creams : Milan : Milano : Trattoria Masuelli : zucchini
   flower fritters with mozzarella and anchovies

166 Responses to “MEMORIES OF MILANO”

    1. Christie says:
       June 15, 2015 at 11:56 pm
       Thank you for another ice cream maker-less recipe. I made the
       strawberry ice cream yesterday and it was amazing. This also sounds
       incredible. For next weekend, I suppose!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 15, 2015 at 11:59 pm
            Bonsoir Christie, I am so happy you enjoyed the strawberry
            ice-cream recipe – I have a target this summer to make more
            delicious ice-cream without an ice-cream maker! 🙂 Mimi x
            Reply
    2. cynthia woodyard says:
       June 15, 2015 at 11:56 pm
       You are such a joy to read! Please don’t leave us, and may I add,
       what beautiful children you’re produced! And how lucky they are…….
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 12:00 am
            Thank you dear Cynthia! You are stuck with me – I love Manger
            too much to ever leave! xx
            Reply
    3. Valentina @Hortus says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:00 am
       So glad you had a good time in Milan! It’s such a great place for
       food!
       And so bummed I couldn’t make it to Cibo a Regola d’Arte – I was
       invited as well. I really hope I won’t miss the chance to see you
       cook next time!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 12:01 am
            So sorry I missed you! I can’t wait to be back in Milano! Mimi
            x
            Reply
          + Rose says:
            June 16, 2015 at 12:04 am
            What do you mean you were invited. Was this a group cooking
            class in Milan?
            I cannot believe you live such a beautiful live. So,
            satisfying!
            I am in my law firm working on files and litigation while my
            entire heart wants to be in France or Italy cooking, laughing
            and enjoying life. What a happy life.
            Congratulations.
            Reply
               o mimithorisson says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 12:09 am
                 I was invited to Cibo a Regola d’Arte, it was a lovely
                 gastronomy festival in Milan! 🙂 You should come and visit
                 us and cook a few meals! Mimi x
                 Reply
    4. Julia says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:11 am
       Sounds like it was a lovely trip, Mimi! I am so excited for the
       blog redesign and am grateful Manger isn’t going anywhere!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:17 am
            Manger is our first love! It shall remain forever 🙂 Mimi x
            Reply
    5. Anne says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:12 am
       Omg love your stories! Milan is one of those places that I’ll wish
       to go but probably never get the chance. :/
       I’m looking forward to see your changes to this little space! Not
       that it’s not already gorgeous… But knowing you, it’ll be even
       better than now!
       And that ice cream! Ug lemon and saffron must make for such a great
       flavor combo!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:19 am
            Thank you Anne! The blog will be refreshed and more
            user-friendly. Can’t wait to share. In the meantime, enjoy the
            ice-cream! Mimi x
            Reply
    6. Susan Gabriel says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:13 am
       Thank you Mimi for a real life visit to Milan, complete with spilt
       wine, morning cocktails, stuffing food into suitcases, and longing
       for food left behind…..and for the lemon-saffron ice cream recipe
       just in time for summer’s official start this weekend coming.
       Susan Gabriel
       Gabriel Papers
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:22 am
            You are welcome Susan! What a lovely trip it was – such a
            treat to meet so many wonderful chefs, writers, friends… I
            just can’t wait to go back. It was extra-special to see my
            book in Italian, too. Enjoy the recipes. Mimix
            Reply
    7. Laurence says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:16 am
       Hi Mimi! I have been a great fan of your wonderful blob for quite a
       while, and I want to thank you for bringing so much inspiration and
       delight into this food-obsessed mind of mine! As Italian food is my
       favourite, I enjoyed this post so much and even envied you for
       tasting so many tasteful Italian dishes!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:23 am
            Oh thank you Laurence! I am so in love with Italy, it’s always
            a pleasure to go back, and this time I got to meet so many
            great chefs. Viva Italia! Mimix
            Reply
    8. Peita says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:40 am
       Delicious reading! Your post bought back great memories of Italy
       and the desire to return!!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:26 am
            Thank you. It’s a pleasure to be back and share these great
            memories. Mimi x
            Reply
    9. LA CONTESSA says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:41 am
       I have GOOSEBUMPS Mimi……….all over my body!From you three escaping
       to Milano for the weekend to the room of Italian’s giving you a
       standing ovation!
       The Missoni story…………OMG!!!!!
       The coffee story………..
       The photos of the spilled VINO!!!!!!!
       The gentlemen who meet for morning COCKTAILS!!!They LOOK SO ITALIAN
       TOO!Those men always want to hold the baby too which I adored!
       I smile so much and get VERY emotional reading your POSTS……….I do
       not know when I can get there but Just know YOU and YOUR FAMILY are
       on MY BUCKET LIST and it will happen…….it might be for AUDREY’s
       wedding but WE will meet up one day and have a beautiful Prosecco
       together…….that’s a PROMISE!!!!!
       XOXO
       YOUR CONTESSA
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:29 am
            Oh la la Contessa! You are always so wonderful! 🙂 We can’t
            wait to see you too – don’t forget, you’ll be my driving
            instructor, right? We’ll catapult right into the vineyards!
            See you sooooon! Mimi x
            Reply
               o Heather in Arles says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 10:38 am
                 This post just filled me with a lot of joy – well, they
                 usually do! But as I was nearing the end and scrolling
                 over and over the photos and phrases I thought, “Oh, I
                 can’t wait to see how La Contessa is going to respond to
                 this!” 🙂 Yes, we will get her back over here one of these
                 days. I think that I am finally ready to learn how to
                 drive…maybe…
                 And a note to Oddur: I love that you didn’t have your
                 camera with you on that very special evening. I am also
                 the companion of a photographer and yes, at times it is
                 wonderful to know that I am just there with him, just the
                 two of us (even if he is taking photos in his mind ; )!
                 Reply
                    # mimithorisson says:
                      June 16, 2015 at 10:52 am
                      Bonjour Heather! Lovely to hear from you, and yes,
                      we all love to hear from la dear Contessa 🙂 One day,
                      one day, we shall be driving with her! And so lovely
                      to hear your thoughts on the camera, it’s nice to
                      take a break sometimes! Bonne semaine, Mimi x
                      Reply
               o LA CONTESSA says:
                 June 17, 2015 at 8:52 pm
                 Then I better get to work on that ITALIAN HUSBAND and
                 tell him I need to get TO FRANCE sooner then later……….as
                 YOU will be needing to drive BEFORE AUDREY gets
                 engaged!!!!!
                 I AM ON MY MISSION!
                 YOU CAN COUNT ON ME!
                 XO
                 Reply
   10. stacey snacks says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:58 am
       I love many of Oddur’s pics, but my new favorite is the one of you,
       the baby & the 3 Italian men w/ specs……
       also, who knew Italians drink Ruffino Ducale Riserva Chianti!?
       One of my favorites, no matter what the year, such a nice wine.
       Lovely trip, as always!
       xo Stacey
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:35 am
            Bonjour Stacey! How, how lovely it was to get away to Milan.
            And that wonderful place, Marchesi. Amazing coffee and cakes,
            and even more amazing crowd! It’s always a pleasure to drinks
            Italian wines, so different from Medoc… if ever you go to
            Milan, please do go visit those 2 restaurants – happiness
            guaranteed! Mimi x
            Reply
   11. casey says:
       June 16, 2015 at 1:15 am
       What a lovely post in every way. We will be in Bordeaux in
       mid=September. Are you still planning to have a petit restaurant
       open then?
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:38 am
            Hi Casey – lovely to hear from you! We are planning a small
            vacation in September but no official dates… will update you!
            Mimi x
            Reply
   12. Margot says:
       June 16, 2015 at 1:36 am
       Morning from downunder Australia this is my first comment to your
       blog after a long period of subscription I wait each month for its
       arrival as I know it will be full of amazing photographs lovely
       snippets about all kinds of delectable bits and is a great
       substitute when we are not in Europe I wander with you to the many
       places you go and the enjoyment helps the planning of our next
       European adventure this year we are combining food with rugby
       starting with a 10 day stay in the Bordeaux Dordogne region.
       I love your blog and your book is a constant companion on my
       bedside table, many times read and I cannot wait to see and read
       your new version. Thanks for the “enjoyability” Margot
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:39 am
            Oh thank you dear Margot – I am so touched! How lovely to hear
            you are planning this great trip – sounds heavenly. Let me
            know if you want any hotel/restaurant etc; tips. Mimi x
            Reply
   13. Camille says:
       June 16, 2015 at 2:20 am
       The post hardly needed photographs to accompany the words that
       painted the most fantastic picture! I’m excited for the new changes
       to the blog. I can’t get enough of Manger!
       Silly Medley: Lifestyle and Travel
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:40 am
            Thank you dear Camille! Mimi x
            Reply
   14. Mel says:
       June 16, 2015 at 3:04 am
       What a beautiful blog about your trip to Milan, meeting your
       favourite designer and am always looking forward to your next blog
       and cannot wait to see what you’re doing to do with it. And no
       blaming Audrey for spilled wine!!! lol ox
       Reply
          + Piera says:
            June 16, 2015 at 3:16 am
            My sister and I love your blog! It makes us so happy here in
            western Pennsylvania to experience France and Italy through
            your beautiful pictures and words. God bless you and your
            family!
            Reply
               o mimithorisson says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 9:40 am
                 Big big thank you Piera! I am so touched! Mimi x
                 Reply
   15. Amy says:
       June 16, 2015 at 3:38 am
       Ooph, that comment made by Oddur, about taking pictures without a
       camera (and most of them of you) — so nice. You are lucky to have
       each other, I am sure.
       As always I enjoy your posts. Never feel guilty about posting too
       little, as I feel you are a person who always chooses quality over
       quantity… with that being said, I am excited about these new
       changes to your blog, albeit a little nervous that someone will be
       contributing that’s not you or your husband! 😮 but I trust your
       tastes, haha, so I shouldn’t be too scared.
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:44 am
            Hi Amy! Thank you for your sweet comment. Oddur and I always
            feel guilty for not posting more often, this morning we both
            agreed we should post our next story by Sunday/Monday (yes, we
            prepared a goodie post! Lots of exciting food!). No worries
            regarding contributors… It will be fun. 🙂 A bientôt, Mimi x
            Reply
   16. Kathy says:
       June 16, 2015 at 3:45 am
       Your posts, however long the time between them, are always worth
       the wait! Eloquent writing, gorgeous photos…a feast for the eyes
       (and tummy)!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:46 am
            Thank you dear Kathy! Our blog is our passion, it’s the
            greatest pleasure to share through food, words and photos.
            We’ve got a special post coming up next, so stay tuned! Mimi x
            Reply
   17. Kathleen Kramer says:
       June 16, 2015 at 3:47 am
       Oh, did I need some Mimi today! Thank you, as always, for sharing a
       bit of your life with us. Laughed out loud when I realized the
       three natty, bespectacled gentlemen in the photo with you and
       Audrey were in fact the AM cocktail-drinkers!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:48 am
            Ah, the contrast of morning life in Milan! What a bunch of
            chic & adorable gentlemen, drinking their cocktails and
            charming us with their stories. Glad you enjoyed the pics!
            Mimi x
            Reply
   18. anita says:
       June 16, 2015 at 4:07 am
       Your baby is such a little munchkin, she’s adorable, so cute and
       special-looking, love her adorable, graceful face.
       Lemons must be just one of the many connections i have with Italy,
       a country i’ve loved and felt a connection to since longer than i
       can remember. As an aside, best coffee i ever had was in the Milan
       train station.
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:50 am
            Thank you Anita! Audrey is very sweet, and very gourmande! Her
            favorite food? Risotto alla Milanese – every spoon is followed
            by a NAM! Italy is my favorite holiday destination, I have to
            admit! The food, the passion, the people, the art (and
            fashion)… it’s all there. Mimi x
            Reply
   19. Vy says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:57 am
       I always enjoyed zucchini flowers stuffed with ricotta and
       sometimes crab meat but haven’t seen a version with mozzarella and
       anchovies until now! Can’t wait to try it!
       Reply
   20. Frank says:
       June 16, 2015 at 6:45 am
       What a couple you are! Such a composer as a photographer – and such
       a talented model and actress! I enjoy your publications like I
       enjoy good food 🙂
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:52 am
            Oh la la, Frank, you are too kind! Merci. Mimi x
            Reply
   21. Lesley says:
       June 16, 2015 at 8:58 am
       Milano.. One of my favourite cities. I have my sister visiting next
       week who loves her ice cream so guess what I will be making. !! Of
       course I may have to taste it before she arrives…which means I will
       probably have to make a new batch..lol. Love your stories.. Until
       next time ..xxx
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 9:57 am
            Hello Lesley! Enjoy the ice-cream, hopefully your sister will
            like/love it too! Make sure to whisk until very fluffly. Mimi
            x
            Reply
   22. Eva says:
       June 16, 2015 at 9:08 am
       So nice post Mimi !
       Quand on va au restaurant avec mon mari, c’est un peu la même
       histoire. La personne qui choisi le resto prends beaucoup des
       risques ! ça peut être la gloire (comme tu bien dit) ou la défaite
       ! En plus, quand on est dans une ville magnifique italienne avec
       des restos partout, c’est double risque !
       J’aimé bien les mots d’Oddur, prendre des photos sans appareil,
       c’est juste magique et beau !
       Audrey a bien grandie et elle est tellement mignonne !
       L’autre jour je me suis allée me baladé chez Mollat, j’ai vu ton
       livre mais on anglais! C’est pour quand la version française? La
       bas, mon dit qu’on septembre…
       Sage décision de n’est pas abandonner le blog totalement !!
       Tu as la chance d’avoir rencontre Rosita Missoni, moi aussi je
       l’adore !
       Très belles photos et succulents recettes. J’adore les fleurs de
       courgette ! Bon fin de semaine !
       Reply
   23. Alison says:
       June 16, 2015 at 9:32 am
       I have checked every day to see whether a new post has been added.
       And this morning, there it was, in all its glory: thank you for
       brightening my Tuesday!
       xx
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:03 am
            Thank you Alison! You are too sweet! Enjoy! Mimi x
            Reply
   24. Manu says:
       June 16, 2015 at 9:40 am
       Thankyou Mimi it was so great to meet you and now see you soon in
       medoc ;))
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:03 am
            Oh my, it was such a pleasure to see you in Milan (I only wish
            we could spend more time together)! Perhaps I’ll see you
            before your trip to Médoc, we might be back sooner than you
            think! 🙂 I am so excited to see you here – loved your pics in
            Lake Como, I want to go too! A bientôt, Mimi x
            Reply
   25. mimithorisson says:
       June 16, 2015 at 9:56 am
       Thank you Yasmina! So happy to hear you tried the ice-cream – it’s
       a hit here! As for Allegra, she’s the sweetest assistant I could
       ever find, so warm, genuine and lovely. Have a lovely week! Mimi x
       Reply
   26. mimithorisson says:
       June 16, 2015 at 10:00 am
       Bonjour Eva – quel plaisir de vous revoir ici! Et oui, ces
       dernières semaines ont été si folles, entre les ateliers, visites
       et voyages… mais le blog reste ma première passion! Milan fut
       sublime, j’ai trop hâte d’y retourner. Heureuse d’entendre mon
       livre est chez Mollat! La version française sort le 16 Septembre
       chez Hachette! Vive la version française! Bisous, Mimi x
       Reply
   27. Alina says:
       June 16, 2015 at 10:19 am
       Dear Mimi,
       Thank you so much for your wonderful posts. Not being the typical
       blogger “once-a-day” ones makes them much more awaited and
       interesting, specially because it’s sooo clear you put all your
       heart in them. I look forward to seeing Manger’s revamp.
       Félicitations!!!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:50 am
            Thank you dear Alina! You can’t imagine how touched I am by
            your kind words. Merci! Mimi x
            Reply
   28. Su says:
       June 16, 2015 at 11:06 am
       Mimi, once more you write beautiful stories along with amazing
       images that just makes us want to be right next to you.
       I’m just one tiny of your million fans but for what is worth I’m
       really happy that you intend to keep ‘feeding’ Manger.
       Today I talk a bit of you at my own ‘place’ and the amazing present
       my husband gave me for my bDay 🙂
       Thank you Mimi for making me happy.
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 11:32 am
            Thank you lovely Su! It is a delight to get such warm messages
            – and happy belated birthday to you! Mimi x
            Reply
   29. V Söderqvist says:
       June 16, 2015 at 11:21 am
       Love everything!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 11:32 am
            Merci! Mimi x
            Reply
   30. cecile says:
       June 16, 2015 at 11:27 am
       Hello Mimi, what a happy and summery post! I love your story about
       picking a restaurant in Milano. it is exactly the same when my
       husband and I have an evening or week end off. The choice of the
       restaurant matters so much! and tell Oddur that with or without his
       camera, his pictures are always beautiful and lively! And the story
       of the wine glass… I really thought it was Audrey as it has
       happened so much in my family! Actually I count the meals when we
       don’t spill one glass (of water!). Thank you for the recipes, can’t
       wait to try them. And the bruschetta, mon péché mignon!!
       Vive le début de l’été; Je te contacte debut juillet pour voir si
       on peut se voir dans le Sud Ouest. Bises Cécile
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 11:38 am
            Bonjour Cécile. Lovely to hear from you. I usually feel like a
            hawk at the table, watching over all the glasses! We have
            broken so many 🙂 It’s my 6th sense at the table. We had a
            super time in Milan, now I want to go back for more, dreaming
            about the food I didn’t get to eat, the galleries I wanted to
            see… always more, more and more! And yes, vive l’été… À très
            vite, Mimi x
            Reply
   31. Jude says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:29 pm
       Welcome back Mimi, I was worried we’d lost you Milan! Fabulous
       photos and storyline as usual. You and Oddur know how to have fun
       together. Tour de France starts soon – Australia’s multicultural
       channel (SBS) has 4 hours of ‘France” each night, but we still NEED
       blog installments. Best wishes, jude.
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 2:38 pm
            Thanks Jude – so happy to be back on track! I missed chatting
            to everyone – it’s such a pleasure! Enjoy Tour de France, as
            well as the recipes! Mimi x
            Reply
   32. Miranda says:
       June 16, 2015 at 12:40 pm
       Poor Audrey getting blamed for the spilling of wine!! It’s supposed
       to be lucky, so here’s to the lucky girl, she’s so adorable, by the
       way!!! I love italian cuisine, it’s where I honestly grab most of
       my inspiration – the flavours, the cooking methods, the pairings,
       the ingredients… wish I could afford to go to Italy!
       http://bloglairdutemps.blogspot.pt
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 2:38 pm
            Bonjour! Than Oddur is the lucky one 🙂 Cheers, Mimi x
            Reply
   33. Aleksandra @ Vanilla & Staubzucker says:
       June 16, 2015 at 1:32 pm
       Bonjour Mimi,
       I just finished reading Angela’s book, I red it as a novel! It’s so
       simle and so true. I love it. Cooking is “Art”, it is passion, so
       let’s always enjoy it! From Italy with love!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 2:40 pm
            Bonjour! Angela is a gem, she’s got a heart of gold and she’s
            a gifted cook. Cooking is definitely art! Enjoy this wonderful
            season! mimi x
            Reply
   34. Paul says:
       June 16, 2015 at 1:34 pm
       Bonjour Mimi!
       Everytime we leave Italy, we have in bags ~5kg pastas, over a dozen
       bottles of wine, spices and few soaps 😉 It’s fantastic to open
       later a bottle of magic chianti classico or barolo and cook
       tartuffi pasta with tartuffi cheese (or my favourite pici with
       aglio, olio e peperoncino)!
       And lemons… Did you try limoncello? It’s fantastic on lazy summer
       evening. I make it myself. Everytime is fantastic!
       Greetings from Poland!
       Paul
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 2:42 pm
            Bonjour Paul! You sound just like us Paul – a heavy-duty
            traveller! One of my friends told me it was worth sending
            parcels home filled with goodies, I think I will also take
            that option next time! As for limoncello, I love it, reminds
            me of our holidays on the Amalfi coast! Divine! Mimi x
            Reply
               o Paul says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 5:31 pm
                 We take one or two additional bags for goodies each time
                 we have holidays. So when we back we look like just move
                 from somewhere 😉
                 Reply
   35. Monique says:
       June 16, 2015 at 2:47 pm
       ♥
       The girls reading YOUR book..that must feel so special!
       Your blog is absolutely more than perfect right now..:)
       Such gorgeous phtographs..a new book every time you publish a post.
       Little Elle is growing so fast!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 3:13 pm
            Hello Monique! Thank you for such a lovely message – the girls
            are so happy to discover the book is different languages – so
            far they’re seen in in Italian, Chinese and very soon in
            French! Happy summer! Mimi x
            Reply
   36. Lois says:
       June 16, 2015 at 4:02 pm
       Such a delightful post! I love the picture of you, with Audrey on
       your hip, so demurely and stylishly sipping your espresso in the
       crowded cafe. Marget’s note prompted me to write … not only are my
       daughter and I huge fans of your site, cookbook, children, stories,
       recipes, photos and yes I must admit, the dogs, we also are
       planning a trip to the Bordeaux region this summer complete with
       some time canoeing and camping along the Dordogne – we are not
       campers! It shall be an adventure. My question to you in this
       rather lengthy post is, how far away are you from that region? We
       are Canadian so not daunted by distance ;). Also is your bistrot by
       any chance up and running? We would love an excuse to say hello.
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:50 pm
            Bonsoir Lois! Lovely to hear from you. Dordogne is approx. 2
            hours or so by car from here, so you are not too far away! Our
            little bistrot will be open end July towards beginning of
            August. Do send me a little email if you ever visit the Medoc
            region – you’ll just have to have lunch at 1 Rue de Loudenne!
            Mimi x
            Reply
   37. Andrea says:
       June 16, 2015 at 4:09 pm
       Lovely. Now that my momentary escape from spreadsheets in
       Pittsburgh to beauty in Milan is over, back to reality.
       What is the dress you are wearing with Angela Frenda? The ecru and
       black, love it.
       Reply
          + Andrea says:
            June 16, 2015 at 4:11 pm
            Also, LOVE Eggplant. Do you have a version of Aubergine
            Caponata that you could share?
            Reply
               o mimithorisson says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 10:52 pm
                 Ah, yes, that eggplant dish was lovely! Will get back to
                 you, perhaps I can ask my Italian friends! Mimi x
                 Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:51 pm
            Hello Andrea – so glad you enjoyed the post – a little escape
            indeed! My dress is from Valentino – I got it last summer.
            Mimi x
            Reply
   38. Imen says:
       June 16, 2015 at 4:14 pm
       Absolutely brilliant Mimi, I’m glad you had some leisure time away
       from home, sounds/looks like a very fulfilling visit to Italy…and
       watching Massimo in action, wow. I was so inspired by his little
       film Il Ritorno….just beautiful. I’m interested in a fall class,
       will email! Imen xx
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:55 pm
            Hey Imen! Lovely to hear from you! It was a perfect getaway –
            I just wish I had more time! Oh well, I’ll just have to look
            forward to my next visit. This trip was extra special due to
            ‘La Mia Cucina in Campagna’ – funny how it is to see my book
            in other languages! 🙂 Massimo was fantastic, so energetic and
            fun. It would be fab to see you here in the fall! Mimi x 🙂
            Reply
   39. Stacey Flora says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:08 pm
       You take my breath away with each post! You, your family, your blog
       & your book – I absolutely adore it all. Thank you so much for your
       inspiration & for sharing!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:56 pm
            Thank YOU Stacey for such sweet words! Mimi x
            Reply
   40. Moira Hepburn says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:08 pm
       I just adore this blog!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:56 pm
            Merc! XX
            Reply
   41. Memories Of Milano | Pkmeex's Foodblog says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:13 pm
       […] Read the source article at Manger […]
       Reply
   42. Rene Marie Foust says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:14 pm
       I look forward to reading your blog; I check daily to see what you
       might have shared with us. I love the pictures and stories of
       French country living, its my opportunity to live vicariously
       through your words. Thanks for sharing
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:56 pm
            It’s always a pleasure! Thank you! Mimi x
            Reply
   43. Alison Engstrom says:
       June 16, 2015 at 5:30 pm
       I am just delighted to see another post, I have missed them! Just
       returning from a two week sojourn to Sicily and the Aeolian
       islands, I am craving anything Italian. By the way, have you been
       to Sicly? It is a food lovers paradise, just heaven. Cannot wait to
       see the redesign! xx
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:57 pm
            Oh, I can’t wait to visit Sicily – I will love it, that’s for
            sure! Lucky you! Mimi x
            Reply
   44. PEGGY BRASWELL says:
       June 16, 2015 at 6:30 pm
       love me some Italy + especially Milan + great.
       xxpeggybraswelldesign.com
       Reply
   45. Leanne says:
       June 16, 2015 at 8:23 pm
       Mimi, your blog is such a feast for the eyes. I look forward to
       every new post!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:57 pm
            Merci Leanne! Mimi x
            Reply
   46. Zarina says:
       June 16, 2015 at 8:32 pm
       Its so amazing and inspirational! thank you!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:57 pm
            Thank you Zarina – I am very touched. Mimi x
            Reply
   47. gabriele says:
       June 16, 2015 at 10:18 pm
       Comme cela fait plaisir et du bien de vous lire à nouveau! non
       seulement vous nous apprenez de merveilleuses choses mais en plus
       vous nous rapportez des souvenirs de vos voyages qui nous
       permettent de rêver.Je fais aussi mon Limoncello, c est une
       parcelle d Italie dans un petit verre glacé à savourer. continuez
       je vous en pris à nous enchanter
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 16, 2015 at 10:58 pm
            Merci Grabriele ! je suis très touchée. A bientôt, Mimi x
            Reply
               o mimithorisson says:
                 June 16, 2015 at 11:00 pm
                 ps: Et bravo pour votre ‘home-made’ limoncello!
                 Délicieux!
                 Reply
   48. cR says:
       June 16, 2015 at 10:54 pm
       That costoletta alla Milanese is one honkingly big piece o’veal!!!
       I love that dish and recently ordered it for pre-theatre (Fun Home)
       dinner in NYC. Very underwhelmed – underseasoned /undersalted
       /maybe old oil? I think it was simply & sadly not enough salt. At
       least I didn’t get ill. Tell me how glorious your cutlet was,
       please!
       Reply
   49. anita says:
       June 17, 2015 at 12:10 am
       Hello Mimi!!!
       I’ve never been to Milan but I’ve just felt I was there with
       you!!!! Those gorgeous photos!!! As usual our seasons are not
       aligned and zucchini flowers are a distant memory of what was a
       beautiful Summer here but one thing I can explore is your ice-cream
       recipe as we have buckets of lemons from the trees at Vue…….just
       need to dash out for saffron. Mimi, if you have a minute (your time
       is precious) click on the http://www.vueatjindivick.com web page
       and go to photos and media. We are mentioned in a magazine in a
       section called Gippsland on a Plate. Great news that your workshops
       have been extended. Do you think you could cope with me and La
       Contessa in one…..hahaha??? Looking forward to October and will
       email you closer to the time. xx Anita
       Reply
   50. Nadia says:
       June 17, 2015 at 12:48 am
       Chere Mimi,
       So pleased to get some news from you. I was getting concerned.
       Audrey is growing up so quickly and looks tres mignonne. We move to
       Dordogne in 10 days, I am so excited. Once all settled in, I can’t
       wait to come out and visit the Medoc.
       Bisous
       Www. Maisontravers.com
       Reply
   51. sonrie says:
       June 17, 2015 at 2:45 am
       Thank you for a post, as always. I enjoy reading about your
       adventures and seeing a new part of the world for me. The colors,
       the food, and the culture.
       Reply
   52. Dana says:
       June 17, 2015 at 4:15 am
       Bonjour Mimi! I just LOVE when there’s a new post from you &
       Oddur…& I quite like that it’s not too frequent. It’s like getting
       a special surprise gift filled with beauty! I do look forward to
       the new things you all have in store as well!
       I’m so happy that you all had such a great time in Italy! Italy is
       such an amazing place to escape to…and the food, I can totally
       relate to wanting to eat absolutely everything!!! 🙂 Congratulations
       on the continued success of your book! I can only imagine your
       excitement to see your words in different languages! xo, Dana
       Reply
   53. Lili Fujiy says:
       June 17, 2015 at 6:10 am
       beautiful post and great news! lovely as always!
       Reply
   54. Canal Cook says:
       June 17, 2015 at 9:31 am
       I love zucchini flowers, they’re impossible to find in Ireland
       though. This recipe sounds gorgeous’
       Reply
   55. Elizabeth says:
       June 17, 2015 at 11:33 am
       Hi Mimi, I can’t wait to try the new lemon ice-cream recipe but one
       question, by whipping cream do you mean crème fraîche entière or
       the runnier crème fluide which is available in France? And no
       concentrated condensed milk? The kids will be disappointed here 🙂
       Reply
   56. Sophie says:
       June 17, 2015 at 12:28 pm
       Mimi this was a delightful read(all your stories are a delight!). I
       would love to try my hand at the zucchini flower fritters plus that
       lemon icecream looks effortlessly wonderful!
       Reply
   57. Marja says:
       June 17, 2015 at 1:11 pm
       Hola Mimi from Costa Brava! I enjoy immensely reading your blog –
       the whole “package” with awesome photos is so complete and fulfills
       several levels of pleasure … Therefore your announcement about
       revamping the page makes me terribly curious, but at the same time
       I’m a little afraid. You see, I receive newsletters from a couple
       of food lovers/cooks, and sometimes there is such a profusion from
       each of them, that I nearly say “again?”. But then again, I know
       that I can have confidence on your sensibilities… By the way, just
       bought zucchini flowers!
       Reply
   58. Nora says:
       June 17, 2015 at 1:49 pm
       Bonjour Mimi, je suis française et je préfère vous écrire dans ma
       langue maternelle. Je trouve votre blog très réussi, des moments
       magiques qu’on imagine emprunts de grâce, avec vous, on est
       toujours dans un univers poétique, contemplatif et savoureux… Je
       suis artiste et je retrouve souvent dans ce que vous donnez à voir
       une petite part de ma vision du monde, de la vie.. Merci mille fois
       pour vos émissions et pour votre générosité.
       Reply
   59. Syeling says:
       June 17, 2015 at 3:45 pm
       Dear Mimi, finally the new post is here! I have been waiting since
       the last post. Your trip to Italy is lovely! The ice cream recipe
       sounds good for the warm weather here in Singapore. Can’t wait to
       try it! Looking forward to your next post ~
       Reply
   60. Laura Gabriel says:
       June 17, 2015 at 3:47 pm
       Thank you from the bottom of my little heart for your column. It
       makes my day just that much brighter to see a post from you. It’s
       like taking a mini vacation from my home to yours.
       Reply
   61. Sandrine says:
       June 17, 2015 at 8:38 pm
       This morning, on the way to the office there was a farmer selling
       zucchini flowers, so after reading your post last night… I bought a
       full bag of it!
       I baked them in the oven stuffed with mozzarella and chorizo and I
       tried as well, fried with a tempura batter… Delicious. Thank you so
       much for the inspiration!
       Reply
   62. Diana says:
       June 17, 2015 at 9:21 pm
       Hi Mimi! I don’t think I can say anything that hasn’t already been
       said so I’ll just say it again. I love your blog, how you write,
       your husband’s photographs, your stories and how I can “visit” your
       corner of the world from my corner of the world on a computer
       screen. I can’t wait to see the redesign!
       Also! May I ask what bag you are wearing in the photo where you are
       drinking your coffee?
       Reply
   63. Miss Gliss says:
       June 18, 2015 at 7:10 am
       I love your post, I love the photos from your husband! I will
       travel to Milan! Right now!
       A bientôt
       Claudia
       Reply
   64. Elisa Bartels says:
       June 18, 2015 at 8:27 am
       Hi Mimi
       I read with interest that you are tentatively changing your blog to
       include contributors. May I humbly suggest that as well as food you
       might like to consider featuring ceramic designers and other
       artisans who make food look even more beautiful. Dare I say “Death
       to the white plate.” Ciao e grazie
       Reply
   65. Amy @apidaecandles says:
       June 18, 2015 at 11:40 am
       Mimi, thank you once again for letting us all travel vicariously
       with you. Morning cocktails with friends, a fabulous idea. Your
       cookbook in Italian, what fun. Fleurs de courgette, I will
       definitely try that recipe. I have some growing in my garden right
       now.
       Reply
   66. Zelda says:
       June 18, 2015 at 12:14 pm
       Hello Mimi. Thank you for taking us on a food tour of Milan. I love
       those old school restaurants and cafes that have been doing things
       the same way forever. Would love to visit Milan myself one day.
       Reply
   67. Aleksandria says:
       June 18, 2015 at 1:34 pm
       Dear Mimi,
       My name is Aleksandra and I adore your blog and instagram. You are
       embodiment of femininity for me. And I wish,someday I will be good
       wife and loving mother as you are. Your hasband makes great
       photoes, can I asks what camera does he use?
       Thank you so much for sharing your lefstyle.
       Reply
   68. Rowaida Flayhan says:
       June 18, 2015 at 2:40 pm
       Hi Mimi,
       It sounds and looks like a beautiful and inspring trip to Milan.
       The photography, the food, your recipes, looks amazing.
       I can’t wait for the redesign of your blog, another great success.
       Best wishes and much Love xo
       PS I was hoping to see you in spring in London when are you
       planning for a trip xo
       Reply
   69. Petra says:
       June 18, 2015 at 11:09 pm
       This woman is copying you, haha
       http://www.frommydiningtable.com
       Reply
   70. Rosa says:
       June 19, 2015 at 11:12 pm
       Nunca con anterioridad habia hecho helado, pero este helado de
       limón ya había llamado mi atención desde que vi la foto en
       instagram. Mi marido ha dicho, que es el mejor helado que ha comido
       nunca, realmente és delicioso . Mimi ,cuando abrirá sus puertas su
       restaurante?, Que tengo que hacer para poder reservar? Con
       cariño,Rosa .
       Reply
   71. Ramita says:
       June 20, 2015 at 12:17 am
       Hi mimi, I recently bought your book and came across your blog. I
       love the book and your blog! Tried your chilled pea soup and tomato
       tart, both were yummy! Thanks for sharing your recipes and life!
       Reply
   72. Olga says:
       June 20, 2015 at 4:23 am
       Dear Mimi, So wonderful to read your post. You write with so much
       enthusiasm, and leave the reader to create the picture based on his
       imagination. Just amazing! Milan sounds spectacular, I am so happy
       you had an amazing time, and sitting next to a Missoni!!! Can’t
       beat that! You must visit Sicily, absolutely incredible people,
       food, and nature.
       I am so very excited to for my workshop in October!!!! Can’t wait!
       Cheers,
       Olga
       Reply
   73. kim says:
       June 20, 2015 at 10:14 am
       you had me at “morning cocktails” !!! xo
       Reply
   74. valerie says:
       June 20, 2015 at 10:37 am
       With so much fame and glam it’s good to hear you still love your
       readers:-) A little goes a long way! Looking forward to see what
       you come up with next on the blog, my favorite of all your
       productions!
       Reply
   75. Jane says:
       June 20, 2015 at 6:29 pm
       Loving the photo’s and looking forward to the blog change’s – best
       pic “basket on the head”! Can’t wait for the next one! Special
       request House pictures x
       Reply
   76. Kristin Smith says:
       June 20, 2015 at 6:37 pm
       The picture you paint, both with words and photographs is
       delightful. When I read it, I feel like I am in Milan. When I was a
       teenager, I spent a summer in Trieste, and reading your post brings
       me right back to our forays into Venice and Florence. I love how in
       Europe food is so much a part of the culture. When I was in
       college, I lived with a family in Tours, France. Lunches were the
       biggest meals of the day – always several courses – entree, salad
       and cheese or fruit. Wine always, of course. I love the slow way of
       living, where meals are savored. Thank you for documenting such a
       lovely way of life!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 23, 2015 at 8:49 am
            Thanks so much Kristin! It’s a pleasure to share. I love how
            you say “wine, always” – it’s a way of living here. I just
            can’t imagine eating food without wine. Have a lovely week (&
            summer!). Mimi x
            Reply
   77. Henry Perazo says:
       June 22, 2015 at 4:12 pm
       Your photos and your writing really inspire me. Thanks for the
       amazing post!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            June 23, 2015 at 8:46 am
            Thank you HENRY! Mimi x
            Reply
   78. Archana says:
       June 24, 2015 at 12:36 am
       May I tell you how gorgeous you are ! I read this myth about chic
       french women and I am beginning to think its all true.
       And beautiful writing. I am also someone who thinks about food day
       and night. And perhaps in my sleep as well. So much I can relate
       to.
       Have you tried Indian food ?
       – Archana.
       Reply
   79. Kerrie in France says:
       June 24, 2015 at 4:58 pm
       Mimi, I have just made your lemon ice cream with saffron and it was
       divine. I will be making it all summer and I think I’ll try
       variations ( with berries ?). Love, love your blog. Are you still
       intending to open a seasonal restaurant at your new home ?
       Reply
   80. Nadia says:
       June 25, 2015 at 7:15 pm
       Chère Mimi,
       I am absolutely in awe of your magnificent vegetable garden. Did
       you start it from scratch? How big is it?
       I might be needing your advice once I move, on Sunday, and try and
       start one in my house in Dordogne.
       Bisous, Nadia
       Reply
   81. Pattie says:
       June 29, 2015 at 9:03 am
       Dear Mimi:
       Your posts are fantastic! I love seeing your home and family
       photos.
       I will be looking forward to your next adventure that you share
       with us!
       Reply
   82. Tammy says:
       June 29, 2015 at 5:47 pm
       Mimi, it is so good to hear from you. As always your words take me
       away to a world far away…what a magnificent summer so far. I cannot
       wait for to see what you have up your sleeve for Manger!
       May the world be sweet and bright where you are are. Take care.
       Toodles,
       Tammy<3
       Reply
   83. Alicia says:
       June 29, 2015 at 6:30 pm
       Hi Mimi! I just wanted to tell you how much I love your blog. I am
       so happy you are not going to stop blogging since your posts are
       always something to look forward to.
       Thanks,
       Alicia
       Reply
   84. gloria says:
       June 30, 2015 at 7:09 pm
       J aime beaucoup your blog Mimi!
       I love so much this blog and the pictures and the kids and all!!
       bizzzz
       Reply
   85. gloria says:
       June 30, 2015 at 7:10 pm
       Merci beaucoup for your recettes!!
       Reply
   86. Helena Attlee says:
       July 1, 2015 at 11:13 am
       Loved your ice cream recipe, and it made me wonder if you know my
       book, ‘The Land Where Lemons Grow’? A few more citrus recipes for
       you in there…
       Reply
   87. Anette says:
       July 1, 2015 at 4:10 pm
       I’m so happy about ice cream recipes without ice cream maker.
       Thanks!
       Love your blog and i am looking forward to the new version.
       Reply
   88. Amanda says:
       July 2, 2015 at 5:13 am
       Hi Mimi,
       The lemon & Saffron ice cream sounded lovely so I tried to make it
       this evening. I followed your recipe to the letter. Everything was
       going perfectly until I folded the whipping cream into the
       sugar/lemon/saffron mix. I continued to whip as you directed and
       instead of thickening the more I whipped the more the ingredients
       separated. Did you ever find this? Would it be better to just fold
       the whipping cream into the mix rather than continue to whip? Lemon
       juice and dairy products are a volatile mix after all!
       This is probably a very basic issue in cooking but bear with me as
       I try to fathom out what happened!
       Thanks,
       Amanda
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            July 3, 2015 at 10:26 am
            Hi Amanda,
            So lovely to hear from you. Regarding the ice-cream, perhaps
            you should try pouring the sugar/lemon mix into the cream
            while whipping (instead of folding the cream into the lemon
            mix)? Perhaps your cream is not rich enough, are you using
            heavy cream? Also, make sure your cream is very cold, now that
            it’s summer it’s harder to whip cream in the heat. Good luck!
            Happy summer, Mimi x
            Reply
               o Amanda says:
                 July 3, 2015 at 6:45 pm
                 Dear Mimi,
                 Thank you so much for getting back to me. I’ll follow
                 your suggestions. Yes, I’d wondered about the fat content
                 (and heat!) too. I’m in Canada and the whipping cream
                 here has a lower fat content I think compared to Europe.
                 We’re also in the middle of a heatwave, so that’s
                 probably not helping! Looking forward to trying it again.
                 Take care,
                 Amanda
                 Reply
   89. Bo says:
       July 6, 2015 at 7:34 pm
       Mimi,
       What a beautiful blog, and the photographs- stunning!
       I am not much of a cook myself, but looking at the pictures I feel
       like running to the kitchen to try one of your recipes. .
       Greetings from Connecticut.
       Bo,
       Reply
   90. Mima Isono @TiptoeingWorld says:
       July 7, 2015 at 8:09 am
       I just stumbled upon your blog and love it instantly. I like this
       post so much, feel like you take us with you on the trip. The
       pictures are so nice. I’m going to give the recipe a try. Thanks.
       Mima || Tokyo Blogger
       Reply
   91. Susie Q says:
       July 7, 2015 at 12:24 pm
       Dear Mimi,
       I love your blog and bought your cookbook.
       I am an avid cook and dont tend to buy books based on blogs (am
       more of a Diana Henry, Elizabeth David, Ottolenghi type of cook)
       but your blog, recipes and life as a ‘maman cook’ in the Medoc
       really appealed. I haven’t been disappointed in the book and I
       really hope that the blog doesn’t change too much. Although friends
       may offer interesting insights, what I really visit Manger for is a
       snapshot into this life and inspiration for family meals and feasts
       for friends and family – please don’t change too much!
       XX
       Reply
   92. Sarah Grignotages says:
       July 7, 2015 at 3:08 pm
       Bonjour Mimi,
       Ton univers me plaît toujours autant, merci toujours et encore,
       pour ce joli partage…
       Reply
   93. afshan says:
       July 9, 2015 at 11:35 am
       Bonjour Mimi,
       I’m a big fan of your way of describing an event and your cooking
       off course. It was so nice to read your memories of Milano.
       Next month I’m going to visit Milan.
       I thank you if you could recommend me some good places to find
       authentic Italien food.
       Because its my first visit to Italy and I want to enjoy it as much
       as possible.
       Afshan
       Reply
   94. Grace says:
       July 10, 2015 at 12:45 pm
       Salut Mimi,
       I made your lemon ice cream this weekend. It was absolutely
       delicious and amazingly rich and smooth without it having been
       churned! a little sweet for me, however, so next time I think I
       will use less sugar. Is your strawberry ice cream as sweet? xxx g
       Reply
   95. Käären Schilke-Cherns says:
       July 11, 2015 at 4:11 pm
       Really beautiful post Mimi. Guess who just brought home saffron & a
       boat load of organic lemons? Ice cream for us!
       Reply
   96. Fine Bessot says:
       July 14, 2015 at 10:23 am
       Bravo Mimi pour votre émission sur Canal. C’est exactement comme ça
       que j’apprécie la cuisine, avec du matériel de base, sans chichi,
       sans l’électronique et les ustensiles hyper sophistiqués des chefs.
       Et en plus vos recettes sont gourmandes. Et les images sont très
       belles. Un grand merci. Amitiés de Fine
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            July 20, 2015 at 6:25 pm
            Merci pour ce gentil commentaire! Bel été à vous! Mimi x
            Reply
   97. Tania Øystese says:
       July 16, 2015 at 5:03 pm
       Hi! I was wondering what the name of that first restaurant was? We
       are going to Milan in two weeks and I’d love to go – sounds
       absolutely wonderful!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            July 20, 2015 at 6:23 pm
            Hello, It’s called Trattoria Masueli – loved it so much. Mimi
            x
            Reply
   98. Lana Kozar says:
       July 18, 2015 at 7:04 pm
       Dear Mimi, what a beautiful story on Milan…like very post the text
       is so inspiring, the pictures beautiful. All your children are so
       charming! We carried your book at our store here in Sag Harbor, NY,
       called MONC XIII and it was a great success! Hopefully you all come
       to the Hamptons and visit us one day!
       All the Best,
       Lana
       Reply
   99. Danita& Tom Backstrom says:
       July 18, 2015 at 11:09 pm
       Its July 18,my wife’s birthday,looking forward to next update to
       your blog.Hope all is well.Cheers to the good wife.
       Reply
   100. Sophie says:
       July 20, 2015 at 6:39 pm
       Bonjour Mimi, nous avons fait un clafoutis aux cerises en suivant
       ta recette du livre hier. C’etait la premiere fois que nous
       faisions un gateau ensemble avec mon mari! Il deteste faire des
       gateaux en general et moi je ne suis pas tres bonne en cuisine. Ce
       gateau fut absolument fantastique et nous allons donc continuer a
       suivre tes recettes et cuisiner ensemble! Merci!!!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            July 23, 2015 at 4:37 pm
            Merci Sophie! Mimi x
            Reply
   101. jacqueline says:
       July 22, 2015 at 2:37 am
       Hi Mimi-
       I’m loving your blog and have, just today, made strawberry ice
       cream from your recipe. It’s freezing as I type. I can hardly wait
       to dig in.
       I’m thinking of making the lemon ice cream next. As I’m on a budget
       I’m wondering if omitting the saffron will be a bad choice. What do
       you think?
       Thanks!
       Reply
          + mimithorisson says:
            July 22, 2015 at 2:59 pm
            Sure, you can definitely try without the saffron. It’ll be
            delicious! Mimi x
            Reply
   102. thefolia says:
       July 23, 2015 at 1:57 am
       Wow…look at the size of those zucchini flowers…amazing! My favorite
       picture is the one of the speckled, white-haired men gawking at
       Aubrey! Happy Travels!
       Reply
   103. Lisa Casey says:
       July 27, 2015 at 7:34 pm
       Coincidentally I just had guests from Milano here this weekend in
       Rhode Island! Now I know some places to try when we visit in
       October. We love coffee (and no one does it as well as the Italians
       – wish we had those quickie coffee bars here in the states, never
       mind Starbucks…).
       I love your cookbook as well as your blog, not just for the lovely
       recipes, photos, and exquisite writing, but for the affirmation
       that good food and wine, cooking and enjoying, is what we are here
       for. I hope to talk my cousin Wendy into taking a class or visiting
       the restaurant when it opens. She is a fantastic baker, and a dead
       ringer for you (I should send you a photo).
       Thank you for the mini vacation I take every time I read this blog.
       It’s like being back in France without air travel!
       P.S. I broke in my tartlet pans from E. Dehillerin with your onion
       tart. Delicious!!
       Reply
   104. Lisa says:
       July 29, 2015 at 7:57 pm
       Okay, I’m now officially in love with your Blog. Your Photography
       is beyond everything, they are purely amazing – congrats!!
       Reply
   105. Luana says:
       July 31, 2015 at 12:40 pm
       Gorgeous post! and gorgeous Massimo Bottura:) Obviously, I am a
       Bottura believer & admirer 🙂
       https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=icks5C1sSqI
       PS I was searching a french white wine you mentioned in some
       previous post… I could not find it 🙁 I must be pleased with the
       usual Tenuta Ca’ Bolani Aquilis Sauvignon.
       Wish you all a great summer! and all the very best.
       Luana
       Reply
   106. Cláudia vasconcelos says:
       August 26, 2015 at 12:59 pm
       Your young children will be great men and women. They are being
       very well educated, with love to the farm and for that growing on
       it.
       Congratulations … for everything
       kiss
       Claudia
       Reply
   107. Memories Of Milano | The Pkmeex Foodblog says:
       September 8, 2015 at 8:06 pm
       […] Read the source article at Manger […]
       Reply

   Leave a Comment

   Name: Required ____________________ Email: Required, not published
   ____________________ Homepage: ____________________
   Comment:
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   __________________________________________________
   Cancel Reply
   Post Comment

   « Previous Post
   Next Post »

Elsewhere

   ____________________ Search
     * Facebook
     * Pinterest
     * Instagram

   © Manger. Powered by WordPress and Manifest

   Follow

Follow Manger

   Get every new post delivered to your Inbox

   Join other followers:

   Email Address_______

   Sign me up!

   Send to Email Address ____________________ Your Name
   ____________________ Your Email Address ____________________
   _________________________ loading Send Email Cancel
   Post was not sent - check your email addresses!
   Email check failed, please try again
   Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.

   IFRAME: likes-master

   %d bloggers like this:
